Twelfth plenary meeting
30 October 1978 at 2.40 p.m. President: Mr. LEBLANC (Canada) Douzième séance plénière
30 октября 1978 г. в 14 ч. 40 мин. Председатель: г-н ЛЕБЛАН /Канада/ (VAS) I pl tat REQUEST FOR THE ADMISSION OF NAMIBIA AS A MEMBER OF UNESCO (item 72 of the agenda) DEMANDE D'ADMISSION DE LA NAMIBIE COMME MEMBRE DE L'UNESCO (point 72 de l'ordre du jour) PETICION DE ADMISION DE NAMIBIA COMO MIEMBRO DE LA UNESCO (punto 72 del Orden del Dia) ПРОСЬБА НАМИБИИ О ПРИНЯТИИ В ЧЛЕНЫ ЮНЕСКО /пункт 72 повестки дня/ (JLN Jo ce y y Lal) оноедеhas YI be E 6
1.1 Le PRESIDENT. - Mesdames, Messieurs, la séance est ouverte. Comme je vous l'ai annoncé ce matin, nous com- mengons cette séance par l'examen du point 72 de l'ordre du jour - Demande d'admission de la Namibie comme membre de 1'Unesco. Vous disposez a ce sujet du document 20 C/118 et j'attire votre attention sur le paragraphe 8 de ce document qui contient la recommandation du Conseil exécutif : a sa 105e session, le Conseil exécutif a adopté la décision 105 EX/9.3 dans laquelle il a recommandé a la Confé- rence générale d'adopter une résolution dont le dispositif se lit comme suit : "Décide d'admettre la Namibie comme membre de 1'Unesco, étant entendu que le Conseil des Nations Unies pour la Namibie, créé par 1'Organisation des Nations Unies en tant qu'autorité administrante légale de la Namibie, sera considéré, en ce qui concerne les droits et obligations découlant de l'admission de la Namibie en tant que membre de l'Organisation, comme le gouvernement de la Namibie jusqu'à la fin de l'occupation illégale du pays".
1.2 Je vous rappelle que conformément àl'article II, paragraphe 2, de l'Acte constitutif et à l'ar- ticle 81, paragraphe 1 (a) du Règlement intérieur de la Conférence générale, la majorité des deux tiers des membres présents et votants est requise pour l'admission de la Namibie. Est-ce que quel- qu'un demande un vote ? Le vote est demandé.
1.3 Je mets donc aux voix le projet de résolution figurant au paragraphe 8 du document 20 C/118. (Le vote a lieu à main levée)
1.4 Le résultat du vote est le suivant : 74 voix pour, zéro contre et 13 abstentions.
1.5 Le projet de résolution recommandant l'admission de la Namibie comme membre de l'Unesco est donc adopté.
1.6 Y a-t-il des délégués qui souhaitent expliquer leur vote ? Je donne la parole au délégué des Etats-Unis d'Amérique.
2.1 Mr. REINHARDT (United States of America): Mr. President, in the past the United States has consistently opposed full membership of the United Nations Council for Namibia in organs of the United Nations system. This is not because we oppose the Council's work, or because we oppose the membership of an independent Namibia in the United Nations system. Indeed, the United States and its Western colleagues on the Security Council have devoted intense efforts during the past 18 months to the establishment, in an internationally acceptable fashion, of an independent Namibia. Our opposition to full membership for the Council has been based entirely on our respect for the principle of law which requires adherence to the Constitutions of the Specialized Agencies. These most often limit full membership to independent States.
2.2 In this exceptional instance, however, my delegation has abstained, because it believes that during the coming year Namibia will become independent in accordance with Security Council resol- ution 435 of 29 September 1978. The United States believes, moreover, that United Nations responsi- bility with regard to Namibia should not end with its independence, and that an independent Namibia must have the benefit of all possible preparation to assume its new role and its new responsibility. Thank you, Mr. President.
3.1 Le PRESIDENT.- Je remercie le chef de la délégation des Etats-Unis.
3.2 Je vous ferai observer que, compte tenu des dispositions de l'article 82 du Règlement intérieur, l'admission de la Namibie vient d'être approuvée à l'unanimité des membres présents et votants.
3.3 Je donne maintenant la parole au délégué de la France.
4. M. TOUSSAINT (France).- Monsieur le Président, si la France a été conduite à s'abstenir dans ce vote, c'est pour des motifs qui n'ont rien de politique. La France a pris position sans équivoque pour l'autodétermination et l'indépendance de la Namibie. Elle participe avec quatre autres membres du Conseil de sécurité de la façon la plus active et la plus positive aux efforts en cours pour faire en sorte que la Namibie accède rapidement et dans les meilleures conditions possibles au statut d'un Etat souverain, libre et indépendant, dont elle a été trop longtemps privée. Le soutien de la France au peuple namibien se manifeste non seulement dans le cadre multilatéral, mais aussi sur le plan bilatéral. Notre abstention a des motifs purement juridiques qui sont ceux qui nous ont amenés à nous abstenir lors du vote sur la résolution 2248 (S-V) du 19 mai 1967 ainsi que sur les résolutions en découlant, notamment la résolution 32/9 E de l'Assemblée générale des Nations Unies. Le Conseil des Nations Unies pour la Namibie n'est pas un Etat ; il n'en a pas les attributs, il ne remplit pas les conditions requises pour devenir membre d'une institution des Nations Unies. C'est pourquoi, tout en comprenant l'impatience de ceux qu'affecte douloureusement l'état de choses actuel, nous avons été conduits à nous abstenir ici, comme dans d'autres institutions des Nations Unies. Merci, Monsieur le Président.
5. Le PRESIDENT .- Je remercie le délégué de la France et je donne la parole au délégué du Royaume-Uni.
6.1 Mr. KIRKNESS (United Kingdom of Great Britain and Northern Ireland): Thank you, Mr. President. I wish to explain very briefly why my delegation abstained. Our view of the legal status of Namibia and of the United Nations Council for Namibia is well known, and I need not reiterate it here. It follows that we do not believe that the provisions of Article II of the Constitution of Unesco are met in this case, and the United Kingdom's position on this vote is explained accordingly.
6.2 The United Kingdom Government has been active in working for the independence of Namibia, and we look forward to seeing that independence attained very shortly, in a manner acceptable to the international community as a whole. Thank you Mr. President.
7. Le PRESIDENT.- Je remercie le délégué du Royaume-Uni et je donne maintenant la parole au délégué de la Répu- blique fédérale d'Allemagne.
8.1 Mr. FABRICIUS (Federal Republic of Germany): Mr. President, I would like to explain why my delegation had to abstain in the vote just taken. Like all the other delegations in this room, we wish and hope that the people of Namibia will obtain full self-determination and independence in the very near future. As you know, my Government
508    together with other members of the United Nations Security Council, is actively participating in initiatives designed to bring about a real solution on the basis of the proposals submitted by the Secretary-General of the United Nations, and to create a free and independent Namibia through free elections under the supervision of the United Nations. We will help this free Namibia by all possible means.
8.2 My Government is of the opinion, however, that the United Nations Council for Namibia should not now claim rights that must be reserved for future governments of an independent Namibia. In our view, Article II of the Constitution of Unesco is very clear in this respect, and makes it possible only for independent States to advance from the status of Associated Member of the Organization to full membership. We therefore abstained in the vote, but I wish to emphasize that we sincerely wish and are actively working for the full independence of Namibia as a State in the very near future. Thank you, Mr. President.
9. Le PRESIDENT. - Je remercie le délégué de la République fédérale d'Allemagne et je donne laparole au délégué des Pays-Bas.
10. Mr. MOURIK (Netherlands): Mr. President, the positive attitude of the Netherlands as far as the present legal status and independence of Namibia are concerned has been expressed on various occasions in a number of international forums. Therefore, I need not repeat it here. We believe, however, that in the present instance the provisions of Article II of the Constitution of Unesco have not been complied with and this explains the Netherlands position on the vote, which was based on purely constitutional considera- tions. Needless to say, we too sincerely hope that Namibia will become independent at a very early date, in accordance with the wishes of its people and in a manner acceptable to the international community as a whole. Thank you, Mr. President.
11 Le PRESIDENT .- Je remercie le délégué des Pays-Bas et je donne la parole au délégué du Japon.
12.1 M. SUGANUMA (Japon).- Monsieur le Président, lors de l'adoption par l'Assemblée générale des Nations Unies à sa trente- deuxième session, en 1977, de la résolution A/32/9 E intitulée "Action des organisations intergouver- nementales et non gouvernementales en ce qui concerne la Namibie", le Japon avait voté en faveur de l'ensemble de cette résolution à l'exception du paragraphe 3 de son dispositif, qui suscitait chez lui des réserves d'ordre juridique et technique tenant à l'interprétation du terme "Etat". C'est pour ces mêmes raisons que nous avons été amenés à nous abstenir dans le vote qui vient d'avoir lieu.
12.2 Cependant, je voudrais profiter de cette occasion pour réaffirmer notre position concernant la Namibie qui consiste à nous opposer fermement à la domination illégale de la Namibie par l'Afrique du Sud, à maintenir notre ferme soutien au peuple de Namibie et à continuer à apporter notre contri- bition au Fonds des Nations Unies pour la Namibie, à l'Institut pour la Namibie et au programme d'enseignement et de formation. Merci, Monsieur le Président.
13. Le PRESIDENT .- Je remercie le délégué du Japon et je donne la parole au délégué de l'Australie.
14.1 Mr. MOTT (Australia): Mr. President, the General Conference has just voted without dissent to admit Namibia as a full member of Unesco, on the understanding that the United Nations Council for Namibia will act as its representative until the present illegal occupation of Namibia is terminated. The Australian delegation Was among those which supported this resolution. Unesco has thus added its voice to those of the International Labour Organisation (ILO) and the Food and Agriculture Organization (FAO) and my delegation is confident that the step we have taken today will be of benefit to the Namibian people.
14.2 My delegation acknowledges that legal complexities surround this resolution, but notwithstand- ing certain reservations, it has seen no compelling legal reason not to support it. For us, the over- riding consideration, which is clearly shared by a majority of our membership, is the main political purpose of the resolution, and the importance and added encouragement it will give to the Namibian people as they progress towards independence in a free and united country.
14.3 The policies of the Australian Government with regard to the issues of decolonization, race and human rights do not require reiteration at this time, although I should say that we see the present resolution as an expression of those policies. However, as a matter of record, and with respect to possible comparable proposals in other international organizations in the future, I would like to state that we shall consider any such proposals on their merits, and with due regard to the particular constitutional provisions involved. Thank you, Mr. President.
15. Le PRESIDENT .- Je remercie le délégué de l'Australie et je donne la parole au délégué d'Israël.
16. M. NAJAR (Israël).- Monsieur le Président, je voudrais expliquer brièvement le vote de ma délégation. Israël se réjouira de l'entrée - prochaine - de la Namibie dans la famille des nations quand les conditions de cette accession seront réalisées. En attendant, et pour ne pas compliquer davantage des négociations qui en sont à un point décisif et dont Israël espère qu'elles aboutiront à une juste décision, ma délégation n'a pu que s'abstenir. Je vous remercie.
17. Le PRESIDENT.- Je remercie le délégué d'Israél et je donne la parole au délégué du Canada.
18.1 M. BEAULNE (Canada).- Monsieur le Président, le gouvernement canadien reconnait que le Conseil des Nations Unies pour la Namibie a joué un rôle utile en appelant l'attention des Etats membres sur la responsabilité qui incombe à l'Organisation des Nations Unies à l'égard de la Namibie et sur la situation qui règne dans ce territoire.
18.2 En revanche, le gouvernement canadien a toujours affirmé que les pouvoirs conférés au Conseil ne lui permettaient pas de participer aux activités de l'Organisation des Nations Unies et des insti- tutions spécialisées sur le même pied que des Etats indépendants et souverains. Voilà pourquoi la délégation du Canada, qui ne saurait approuver la demande d'admission de la Namibie comme membre de l'Unesco, a préféré s'abstenir dans le vote qui vient d'avoir lieu. Cette abstention ne signifie aucunement que le gouvernement canadien entend réduire son appui au Conseil dans les domaines de sa compétence. Sa participation active aux initiatives tendant depuis plusieurs mois à préparer les voies d'un règlement pacifique et juste en Namibie témoigne d'un intérêt qui ne se dément pas. Le gouvernement canadien continue, dans toute la mesure de ses moyens, à soutenir la cause des habi- tants de la Namibie.
19. Le PRESIDENT .- Je remercie le délégué du Canada et je donne la parole au délégué de la Suisse.
20. M. SCHNYDER (Suisse).- Monsieur le Président, Mesdames et Messieurs, la délégation suisse s'est abstenue lors du vote qui vient d'avoir lieu, et ceci pour des raisons d'ordre purement juridique. Elle est d'avis que l'article II, paragraphe 3, de l'Acte constitutif de notre Organisation ne permet d'y admettre comme membres de plein droit que des Etats ayant obtenu leur complète indépendance. Cette position ne saurait toutefois empêcher le gouvernement suisse de souhaiter voir la Namibie accéder à l'indépen- dance dans un avenir aussi proche que possible. Merci, Monsieur le Président.
21. Le PRESIDENT .- Je remercie le délégué de la Suisse et je donne la parole au délégué de la Belgique.
22. M. DENIS (Belgique).- Monsieur le Président, l'explication de vote que je vais fournir ressemblera fort à celles qui ont déjà été données à cette tribune par les orateurs qui m'y ont précédé. La Belgique s'est abstenue pour des raisons purement juridiques, fondées sur l'article II de notre Acte constitutif, et non pour des raisons politiques. Mon pays a d'ailleurs adopté une attitude analogue lorsque le même problème s'est posé à l'OIT et à la FAO. Ceci dit, Monsieur le Président, je m'empresse d'ajouter que notre voeu le plus cher est de voir se terminer l'occupation illégale de la Namibie et de voir la Namibie indépendante se joindre au concert des nations libres. Merci, Monsieur le Président.
23. Le PRESIDENT .- Je remercie le délégué de la Belgique et je donne la parole au délégué de l'Autriche.
24. Mr. BLECHNER(Austria): Mr. President, the abstention of the Austrian delegation in the preceding vote was purely for juridical reasons. I wish, however, to emphasize that we look forward with joy and satisfaction to the full co-operation of independent Namibia in this Organization. Thank you, Mr. President.
25. Le PRESIDENT.- Je remercie le délégué de l'Autriche et je donne la parole au délégué du Nigéria.
26. Mr. IBEGBULAM (Nigeria): Thank you Mr. President. We are pleased that all those Member States, who have explained their abstentions, believe in an independent Namibia and we are also pleased with the efforts which their governments have made, both in the United Nations General Assembly and in the Security Council, towards the independence of Namibia. We, on our part, believe that the action taken here todayby the General Conference of Unesco only helps to reinforce the efforts made by these Member States, which have abstained from voting for admission of Namibia as a full member of Unesco. We believe, also, that Namibia has already waited too long to join the community of free independent States. In this regard, Mr. President, we are only obeying the decisions of the General Assembly, which have already been carried out by Specialized Agencies of the United Nations such as the Food and Agriculture Organization and the International Labour Organisation. We do not want to prolong arguments on this issue, Mr. President, otherwise we would have asked for an interpretation of the legal principles by which most of the Member States, who abstained from voting this afternoon, were guided. This was already done in the 105th session of the Executive Board, but if Member States could bear with us we would ask the Legal Adviser to give an interpretation of these legal principles. Thank you, Mr. President.
27. Le PRESIDENT.- Je remercie le délégué du Nigéria et je donne la parole au délégué du Gabon.
28.1 M. OWONO NGUEMA (Gabon).- Je vous remercie, Monsieur le Président. Monsieur le Président, la délégation gabonaise se félicite de la décision historique que vient de prendre la Conférence générale de notre Organisation en admettant la Namibie au sein de la grande famille de 1'Unesco en tant que membre à part entière. Elle tient à remercier tous les Etats membres ici présents, autant ceux qui ont émis un vote positif que ceux qui se sont abstenus lors du vote, le projet de résolution qui n'a pas suscité d'opposition se trouvant ainsi approuvé à l'unanimité. Par ce vote unanime, notre institution, ayant présentes à l'esprit les dispositions de la résolution 9 adoptée par l'Assemblée générale des Nations Unies à sa trente-deuxième session, a emboîté le pas à d'autres institutions telles que la FAO et l'OIT, et elle facilite par là même le processus d'accession à l'indépendance pleine et entière de la Namibie.
28.2 Monsieur le Président, la délégation gabonaise se félicite de ce vote dont l'unanimité témoigne de l'effort que déploie l'humanité pour vaincre l'apartheid dans cette partie de notre continent. Aujourd'hui, après l'Organisation des Nations Unies, l'Unesco s'engage à apporter toute la contribu- tion voulue pour que le peuple namibien accède le plus rapidement possible à la liberté totale, sans laquelle un peuple n'est pas digne de ce nom.
28.3 C'est pour cela, Monsieur le Président, que le Gabon, pour sa part, voudrait, après le Nigéria, dire au nom de l'Afrique que nous considérons cette contribution comme tout à fait remarquable parce qu'elle va dans le sens de la réintégration d'une partie de notre territoire, et donc de notre peuple, dans le concert des nations libres et souveraines. Je vous remercie, Monsieur le Président.
29. Le PRESIDENT .- Je remercie le délégué du Gabon. Je donne maintenant la parole au délégué du Népal.
30. Mr. UPRAITY (Nepal): Mr. President, I asked for the floor because I was absent when the vote was taken otherwise I would have voted in favour of the resolution. Mr. President, I would ask for your indulgence to make a short comment. First of all, I would like to join the speakers who gave a very hearty welcome to Namibia as a new member of this Organization. With the admission of Namibia, Unesco has moved another step forward towards the goal of universal membership. Mr. President, in Nepal we have always upheld the right of the people of Namibia to freedom, national independence and total integra- tion and we have fully supported the struggle led by the South West African People's Organization for the liquidation of the illegal administration of Namibia by South Africa. We welcome the historic decision by the Security Council on 27 July 1978, as expressed in resolution 431 (1978), with regard to the future of Namibia and we commend contributions made by all the parties concerned to bring a peaceful settlement to Namibia. Mr. President as we have stressed in the past, it is the primary responsibility of the United Nations to ensure early independence for Namibia and free elections under its supervision and control. With Namibia as a member we hope that Unesco will play its full part in expediting the process by which full freedom and independence will be accorded to Namibia at the earliest possible date. Thank you, Mr. President.
31. Le PRESIDENT.- Je remercie le délégué du Népal et j'invite le délégué de la Turquie a prendre la parole.
32. M. SUBASI (Turquie).- Monsieur le Président, j'ai tenu a prendre la parole pour saluer trés chaleureusement, au nom de mon gouvernement et de ma délégation, l'admission de la Namibie à l'Unesco parce que la Turquie est membre du Conseil des Nations Unies pour la Namibie et a l'honneur de le présider. Nous nous réjouissons de la collaboration précieuse que la Namibie fournira à notre Organisation et je tiens dès maintenant à affirmer que ma délégation est prête à collaborer de la manière la plus étroite avec la délégation de la Namibie. Merci, Monsieur le Président.
33. Le PRESIDENT .- Je remercie le délégué de la Turquie et j'invite le délégué de la Somalie à prendre la parole.
34.1 Mr. ABYAN (Somalia): Mr. President, my delegation voted in favour of the resolution just adopted, for two basic reasons. In the first place, the United Nations Council for Namibia has been entrusted with respon- sibility for providing the people of Namibia with education, science, technology and cultural develop- ment and Unesco is morally obliged to pay full attention to the aspirations of that people. Secondly, other members of the United Nations family have already recognized the legitimacy of the claim of the people of Namibia to membership of United Nations agencies, in the interests of humanity at large.
34.2 I would like to add, on behalf of the Arab Group of Member States, that we wholeheartedly welcome Namibia to Unesco, just as we would welcome any other country which has not yet been admitted to our Organization. Thank you, Mr. President.
35. Le PRESIDENT. - Je remercie le délégué de la Somalie et je donne la parole au délégué du Pakistan.
36.1 Mr. Mohammad Ali KHAN (Pakistan): Mr. President, the Government and people of Pakistan welcome the decision to admit Namibia as a full member of Unesco, and consider abstention to signify a measure of support for the resolution. It is thus clear that the international community and the people of virtually the entire world continue Su    to give full support and recognition to the United Nations Council on Namibia as the legal administer- ing authority of that country, and that any regime set up there by South Africa will not be recog- nized by the international community and is destined to fail.
36.2 As a member of the United Nations Council for Namibia since its foundation in 1967, Pakistan has been since then a staunch friend of Namibia and champion of its cause; obviously it would give us immense pleasure to see Namibia emerge as an independent entity. Namibia is the only territory previously under the League of Nations Mandate where the principles of self-determination have not been applied, and it is clearly imperative to accord it the right to self-determination without further delay. The only acceptable solution lies through implementation of all United Nations resolutions on this question, in particular Security Council resolution 385 of 30 January 1976, which states unequivo- cally that free elections under the supervision and control of the United Nations must be held for the whole of Namibia as one political body.
36.3 Mr. President, allow me to stress again that we in Pakistan most strongly support the member- ship of Namibia and welcome it to Unesco, where we are confident that it will play a bold and truly meaningful role. Moreover, it goes without saying that any government set up unilaterally by the Government of South Africa would be totally unacceptable to the people of Namibia, and therefore to the international community. Thank you, Mr. President.
37. Le PRESIDENT.- Je remercie le délégué du Pakistan. Je donne maintenant la parole au chef de la délégation de la Namibie, que nous venons d'admettre comme Etat membre de 1'Unesco.
38.1 M. MICHEL (Namibie).- Monsieur le Président, je voudrais tout d'abord vous présenter mes chaleureuses félicitations pour votre élection à la présidence de cette vingtième session de la Conférence générale de l'Unesco.
38.2 Au nom du Conseil des Nations Unies pour la Namibie que j'ai l'honneur et le grand privilège de représenter, je voudrais saisir cette occasion pour présenter mes cordiales félicitations au Direc- teur général et aux membres du Bureau de la Conférence générale pour le zèle et l'ardeur avec lesquels ils s'acquittent de leur tâche.
38.3 Honorables délégués, par le vote que vous venez d'exprimer, vous avez confirmé le fait que le problème de la Namibie est la préoccupation de toute la communauté internationale.
38.4 Je voudrais, à cet effet, témoigner à l'ensemble des délégations ici présentes l'expression de notre gratitude, au nom du peuple namibien et de son mouvement de libération nationale, la South West Africa People's Organization (SWAPO), pour qui cette élection constitue un encouragement appréciable dans leur lutte pour recouvrer leur dignité et affirmer pleinement leur identité. Je vou- drais vous exprimer ensuite la gratitude du Conseil, autorité administrante légale de la Namibie, investi par l'Assemblée générale des Nations Unies du mandat d'administrer le territoire jusqu'à l'indépendance, pour la confiance que vous venez de lui manifester.
38.5 Tenant compte de cette décision de la Conférence générale, je déclare que le Conseil accepte formellement l'Acte constitutif de l'Unesco et prend l'engagement de respecter toutes ses décisions.
38.6 Bien que la Namibie soit toujours occupée par le régime illégal sud-africain, il existe déjà des questions concrètes que notre délégation va traiter dans les organes compétents, parmi lesquelles il y a l'assistance à de nombreux Namibiens qui pourraient bénéficier d'une aide internationale, la ques- tion des normes, la question de la propagation de l'information et des mass médias et surtout la question du Programme d'édification de la nation namibienne.
38.7 Je voudrais ajouter pour conclure que la décision de la Conférence générale a fait accomplir un pas en avant à la sauvegarde des droits et des aspirations du peuple namibien dont les intérêts sont protégés par le Conseil des Nations Unies pour la Namibie jusqu'à ce que ce peuple parvienne à exercer ses droits légitimes à l'autodétermination et à la véritable indépendance. Merci.
39. Le PRESIDENT.- Je remercie le chef de la délégation de la Namibie, dont l'intervention met fin au débat sur le point 72 de l'ordre du jour, et je vous invite à reprendre le débat de politique générale. GENERAL POLICY DEBATE (continued)/DEBAT DE POLITIQUE GENERALE (suite)/DE BATE DE POLITICA GENERAL (continuacién)/0BCYXIEHUE ВОПРОСОВ ОБЩЕЙ ПОЛИТИКИ /продолжение/ ‏(eE)ةماعلاةدئايسلاةدئقانم
40. Le PRESIDENT.- Je donne la parole à S. Exc. M. Mohsen Foroughi, ministre de la culture et des arts et chef de la délégation de l'Iran.
41.1 M. FOROUGHI (Iran).- Monsieur le Président, Excellences, Mesdames, Messieurs, il m'est fort agréable, Monsieur le Président, de vous exprimer au nom de ma délégation et en mon nom personnel toute la joie que nous
512    cause votre élection à la présidence de la vingtième session de la Conférence générale de l'Unesco, et de vous adresser nos sincères félicitations à cette occation.
41.2 La présente session, qui s'ouvre au seuil de la troisième Décennie des Nations Unies pour le développement, devrait marquer, dans la perspective du nouvel ordre économique international une nouvelle étape de la vie de l'Organisation et de son action pour la promotion de la dignité humaine et l'établissement de la justice internationale.
41.3 J'apprécie également à leur juste valeur les efforts inlassables déployés par M. Martin, pré- sident du Conseil exécutif, qui a su amener l'organe qu'il dirige à formuler des observations et des directives précieuses sur les méthodes de travail et les programmes futurs de l'Organisation.
41.4 Le Projet de programme pour les deux prochaines années (doc. 20 C/5) ainsi que le Projet d'ajustements au Plan à moyen terme (doc. 20 C/4) si excellemment préparés, comme les autres documents de cette Conférence, par M. Amadou-Mahtar M'Bow, directeur général de l'Unesco, té- moignent de l'étendue des vues, de la compétence et du mérite de son auteur.
41.5 Les programmes proposés sont entièrement conformes aux idéaux et aux objectifs de l'Unesco ainsi qu'aux résolutions adoptées par la Conférence générale et aux recommandations des conseils scientifiques intergouvernementaux.
41.6 Priorité y a été accordée aux problèmes majeurs de l'homme, en même temps qu'on y trouve une définition très claire de la responsabilité de l'Unesco dans l'instauration du nouvel ordre écono- mique international y compris ses dimensions sociales et culturelles, dans la promotion des droits de l'homme, dans le renforcement de la paix et l'accélération du progrès de toutes les sociétés en vue de la création d'un monde plus équitable et plus solidaire.
41.7 C'est bien dans cette perspective, et en tenant compte des exigences rigoureuses d'une planifi- cation qui tend à définir les objectifs susceptibles de se traduire réellement en actes, que le Direc- teur général a accordé une attention particulière à la question du développement, celui-ci constituant un domaine très étendu qui englobe les diverses compétences de l'Unesco entendues dans leur sens approprié.
41.8 Ce processus global et multidimensionnel s'applique à toutes les sociétés développées ou en développement. Mais si ce processus multidimensionnel et global est envisagé sous l'angle des élé- ments qui le composent, il ne conduit pas forcément à un modèle adaptable à toutes les sociétés, car le développement ne peut être authentique et endogène que s'il tient compte, avec toute l'attention que cela suppose, de l'ensemble des éléments qui constituent le visage particulier d'une communauté. C'est une question apparemment facile mais pour lui apporter une réponse, il faut pourtant résoudre des problèmes qui constituent le souci principal des pays en développement.
41.9 D'autre part, la diversité et l'universalité du développement - processus omniprésent mais qui ne part d'aucun centre précis - met forcément en question un ordre international qui est basé impli- citement ou explicitement sur la supériorité de certains centres de puissance économique ainsi que sur les relations entre pays propres à cet ordre. C'est la raison pour laquelle nous approuvons le Directeur général de mettre l'accent sur les programmes de l'Organisation visant à atteindre les buts fixés dans la Déclaration sur l'instauration d'un nouvel ordre économique international.
41.10 La présente session de la Conférence générale n'est pas seulement un lieu de débats et d'échanges d'informations, mais aussi le moyen d'orienter, éventuellement en les modifiant, les objec- tifs des Etats membres vers une volonté commune de collaboration. Pour atteindre ce but, il nous faudra adopter une vision à la fois critique et constructive dans l'analyse des problèmes majeurs de manière à arriver, dans un esprit de solidarité, à trouver les moyens de les résoudre.
41.11 Nous vivons dans un monde où il existe des tensions et des dissensions nombreuses et pro- fondes. Nous sommes encore les témoins d'atteintes à l'intégrité territoriale de certains pays. Les infractions aux droits de l'homme, liées à certains aspects de la puissance et à des formes grotesques de racisme, continuent. Du point de vue économique, l'inégalité a pris des dimensions très étendues. Le fait que de nos jours il existe 800 millions d'illettrés dans le monde, le fait que le droit à l'édu- cation, même au niveau primaire, ne soit pas encore mis en pratique dans un grand nombre de pays, le fait enfin que la production et l'utilisation des moyens d'information soient concentrées dans cer- tains pays développés et industrialisés, tout cela démontre l'immensité et la gravité des problèmes internationaux qui ont un rapport direct avec les compétences de l'Unesco. Mais d'autres problèmes tels que l'inflation, le chômage, la croissance démographique, la course aux armements, la dégrada- tion de l'environnement, sont également du ressort de l'Unesco.
41.12 Ce qui nous importe, c'est que les êtres humains soient maîtres de leur destin et qu'ils parti- cipent tous ensemble à la construction d'un monde équilibré et harmonieux et instaurent entre eux des relations créatrices.
41.13 Lorsqu'on aborde les problèmes majeurs du monde, il faut affronter deux questions : la paix et les droits de l'homme. Il est grand temps que l'Unesco se consacre à l'analyse des causes de la violation des droits de l'homme et qu'elle contribue par ses études à la protection de l'homme eu égard aux conditions temporelles et locales.
41.14 La paix mondiale est indivisible, tout comme les droits de l'homme. La paix ne peut être cuves que dans la justice, c'est-à-dire dans le respect des droits de l'homme et de la souveraineté es nations.
41.15 A défaut de volonté des nations du monde de créer un monde juste et équitable, il n'existe aucun espoir d'instaurer la paix. La course aux armements est bien le signe de la méfiance qui plane sur le monde. Cette terrible entreprise gaspille une grande partie des ressources humaines : si on libérait ces ressources pour les mettre au service de l'extension du savoir, de la culture et de l'édu- cation des êtres humains, bien des problèmes actuels du monde se trouveraient résolus. En fait, la nécessité du désarmement est sous-entendue par le concept du nouvel ordre économique international. Le rôle de l'Unesco consiste, devant cet état de choses, à mener une campagne incessante pour alerter les nations du monde contre les dangers de la course aux armements, ainsi qu'à stimuler des recherches sur les effets positifs du désarmement sur le développement de toutes les sociétés.
41.16 En rapport avec ces deux questions, l'Unesco doit poursuivre ses efforts visant à éliminer les diverses formes de colonialisme, de racisme et d'apartheid. Il y a lieu de se réjouir que la Con- férence mondiale de la lutte contre le racisme et la discrimination raciale qui s'est tenue en août 1978 ait exprimé ouvertement son appui a l'effort international pour faire disparaitre le racisme sous toutes ses formes. J'ose espérer que la déclaration sur le racisme et les préjugés raciaux dont le projet final figure à l'ordre du jour de la présente session sera un nouvel instrument au service de l'élimination des absurdes préjugés raciaux.
41.17 Avant d'évoquer les différents chapitres du programme de l'Organisation, j'aimerais souligner deux points fondamentaux. Je suis heureux, d'une part, de constater que l'Organisation considère la décentralisation de ses activités comme une nécessité primordiale. Cette idée a pris corps surtout dans le secteur de l'éducation, puisque 40 % des membres du personnel du cadre organique de l'Unesco exercent actuellement leurs fonctions hors Siège. Les succès obtenus par le Bureau régional de l'Unesco pour l'éducation en Asie et en Océanie (Bangkok) dans la coordination des activités éducatives de la région est une preuve du bien-fondé de la décentralisation. La même expérience pourrait être tentée dans d'autres régions du monde. Il conviendrait que la décentralisation du personnel et des programmes soit assurée dans chaque région et que ce personnel soit orienté vers les bureaux régionaux.
41.18 L'Unesco doit renforcer ses liens avec les communautés intellectuelles internationales dans les domaines de la science, de la littérature et de l'art et demander, pour l'exécution de ses programmes, l'avis des pays qui s'enorgueillissent d'oeuvres intellectuelles et artistiques remarquables. A cet égard, le rôle des organisations internationales non gouvernementales et celui des commissions natio- nales de l'Unesco présentent une importance capitale.
41.19 Grâce aux possibilités offertes à l'homme par la science et la technologie, bon nombre de communautés se sont profondément transformées durant ces dernières années, de sorte que nous sommes à présent témoins de leurs nouveaux succès qui ne cessent de se multiplier.
41.20 On pourrait croire que la science, dans son développement, ne suit que sa logique interne et son mouvement autonome. La recherche scientifique inculque aux savants une conception - qui s'ins- crit dans le contexte de leurs valeurs - selon laquelle la poursuite spontanée des connaissances représente un objectif absolu, hors de toute autre considération.
41.21 Cependant, par les effets qu'elle produit, la science ne peut être considérée comme étant impartiale et le travail du savant, les études scientifiques, la sauvegarde et le transfert des connais- sances scientifiques constituent une réalité sociale et de ce point de vue, la science constitue parfois un des éléments du processus social revêtant un caractère constructif ou destructif, selon le cas, et où se manifeste la responsabilité sociale et éthique des savants.
41.22 L'universalisme de la science, avec ses caractéristiques objectives, devrait faire considérer l'ensemble des connaissances humaines comme un patrimoine commun et mettre en question tout ce qui peut apparaître comme une appropriation exclusive des données scientifiques, permettant ainsi de mettre à la disposition du public les connaissances scientifiques sans réserve ni entrave.
41.23 D'autre part, le lien organique existant entre les effets de la science et le milieu social et culturel qui les conditionne présuppose que la science ne peut s'enraciner dans la société que lors- qu'elle est en harmonie avec ce milieu et répond à ses besoins et à ses aspirations. En conséquence, le développement endogène de la science et de la technique et l'application des progrès scientifiques et technologiques à la satisfaction des besoins du développement culturel, social et économique de tous les pays et en particulier des pays en développement, doivent faire l'objet d'une plus grande insistance dans le programme de l'Organisation et il faut surtout renforcer dans tout le programme l'approche interdisciplinaire ainsi que la part des sciences.
41.24 A l'heure de la préparation de la Conférence des Nations Unies sur la science et la technique au service du développement, je voudrais féliciter le Directeur général de l'Unesco des efforts qu'il déploie pour l'examen des problèmes de la science et de la technique. Il est certain que, par sa compétence en ces matières, l'Unesco jouera un grand rôle dans le déroulement de cette Conférence et qu'elle ne manquera pas de donner la suite voulue à ses résultats en attachant de plus en plus d'importance aux politiques scientifiques et techniques nationales, ce qui implique la création des infrastructures nécessaires à la croissance de leur potentiel scientifique et technique en faisant appel à la participation des communautés scientifiques et techniques nationales.
41.25 Je crois opportun de citer les programmes scientifiques intergouvernementaux comme exemples positifs du programme de l'Organisation dans le domaine des sciences et j'espère que cette Confé- rence envisagera de lancer des programmes scientifiques dans d'importantes disciplines comme l'éner- gie et l'informatique.
41.26 L'aide d'un montant d'un million de dollars fournie par l'Iran à l'Université des Nations Unies en vue de l'étude de l'énergie peut être considérée comme la preuve de l'importance qu'attache mon pays au développement de la coopération internationale dans le domaine scientifique.
41.27 La culture est à la fois universelle et diversifiée. L'identité culturelle est l'élément essentiel du développement des sociétés. Dans le développement culturel, il faudrait tenir compte de la néces- sité de l'épanouissement personnel et du renforcement des initiatives individuelles aussi bien que des responsabilités et des fonctions sociales. Il faudrait également se préoccuper de la planification du développement culturel et de la créativité libre et spontanée.
41.28 La connaissance et le respect de l'identité culturelle, qui impliquent l'échange, l'enrichisse- ment et l'interaction des cultures, sont des objectifs importants de l'Unesco. En ce qui nous con- cerne, nous nous intéressons particulièrement aux recherches sur la civilisation islamique et nous demandons à l'Unesco de participer à la commémoration du millénaire de la naissance d'Avicenne. Nous accueillons également avec satisfaction le projet de révison de l'Histoire du développement scientifique et culturel de l'humanité et nous rappelons à cette occasion l'utilité de la publication par l'Unesco d'une histoire générale de l'Asie, comme du reste des autres continents.
41.29 La délégation iranienne accueille aussi avec enthousiasme le projet de convoquer la deuxième Conférence mondiale sur les politiques culturelles au cours de la période 1980-1982 et elle espère que l'Unesco pourra agir en faveur de l'établissement d'un dialogue entre les diverses cultures ainsi que des échanges d'écrivains et d'artistes. Nous avons déjà fondé en Iran un Centre d'études culturelles à la suite d'une résolution adoptée par la Conférence générale à sa dix-neuvième session. La création du Fonds international pour la promotion de la culture favorisera sans doute la contribution de l'Unesco au développement de la culture et c'est dans cet esprit que l'Iran a versé à ce Fonds une somme d'un million de dollars.
41.30 La protection du patrimoine culturel et naturel du monde, qui constitue la mission du Comité du patrimoine mondial créé en application de la Convention conclue en la matière, compte parmi les nombreuses réussites de Organisation.
41.31 Pour notre part, nous avons contribué à développer les activités du Centre de documentation culturelle de l'Unesco pour l'Asie (Téhéran) et nous poursuivrons en collaboration avec l'Unesco notre assistance financière et technique en vue d'assurer le succès de ce Centre.
41.32 La communication ne doit pas être considérée comme une prérogative officielle et une activité technique, mais il faudrait plutôt la considérer sous l'angle de la signification de chaque message et des effets produits par les moyens d'information.
41.33 Il est regrettable qu'à l'heure actuelle, la diffusion de l'information soit réalisée à sens unique par certains centres situés surtout dans les pays industrialisés et que, de ce fait, les modèles cultu- rels et les messages des pays producteurs des moyens d'information soient imposés aux pays receveurs.
41.34 Les études faites par l'Unesco pour résoudre ce problème, la mise sur pied de la Commission internationale d'étude des problèmes de la communication et la diffusion de son rapport final devraient favoriser l'établissement d'un "nouvel ordre international de la communication".
41.35 L'identité culturelle et l'évolution scientifique et technique exercent plus que jamais leur influence sur les politiques éducatives. C'est sous l'influence de ces deux facteurs que les systèmes éducatifs devraient le plus se transformer.
41.36 Durant toutes ces dernières années, l'Unesco a manifesté un intérêt croissant pour le concept d'éducation permanente. Le système scolaire est en effet un élément du système global de l'éducation dont les activités productives de la société constituent la source principale et inépuisable.
41.37 Toute politique, toute action éducative doit déterminer les objectifs propres à chaque système éducatif en se fondant sur les aspirations et les besoins socio-économiques et culturels de la commu- nauté. De plus, la politique et l'action éducatives doivent rechercher la justice dans le cadre des modèles actuels de société. C'est pourquoi l'Unesco se préoccupe de la démocratisation de l'éducation. Cette question a été examinée lors de la quatrième Conférence régionale des ministres de l'éducation et des ministres chargés de la planification économique dans les Etats membres d'Asie et d'Océanie organisée à Colombo en juillet de cette année, dont les conclusions ont été très positives pour le développement de la coopération régionale dans le domaine de l'éducation. Je suis certain que cette même question se verra accorderl'intérêt qu'elle mérite par la Conférence générale.
41.38 Nous avons acquis en Iran une certaine expérience de la démocratisation de l'éducation dans les régions rurales isolées et dans les régions où vivent des minorités tribales. Des activités ont aussi été entreprises dans le domaine des méthodes et techniques d'éducation et de l'application de la technologie éducative, à propos desquelles nous sommes en contact avec le Centre asien d'innovation éducative en vue du développement à Bangkok.
41.39 Au cours des cinq dernières années, le pourcentage des enfants de 6 à 10 ans scolarisés est passé de 46 % à 80 % et 10 millions d'élèves sont inscrits dans les divers niveaux d'enseignement. L'enseignement primaire est gratuit et l'enseignement secondaire et universitaire est presque gratuit lui aussi. Nous avons pris de nombreuses initiatives dans le domaine de la formation des maîtres et de l'amélioration de la condition des enseignants.
41.40 L'analphabétisme doit être considéré comme un grave problème auquel est confrontée l'huma- nité. Une importance particulière doit être accordée à cette question lors de la troisième Décennie des Nations Unies pour le développement. Nous avons lancé en Iran une campagne nationale contre l'anal- phabétisme. Nous avons créé, avec l'aide de l'Unesco, le Centre national de l'éducation des adultes et nous poursuivrons notre collaboration avec l'Unesco afin que l'Institut international des méthodes d'alphabétisation des adultes puisse continuer ses activités dans les domaines de l'échange d'infor- mations, de la recherche et de la formation des cadres en bénéficiant également d'une participation plus active des Etats membres.
41.41 La délégation de l'Iran espère que les efforts de l'Unesco seront couronnés de succès dans les domaines de la liaison de l'éducation avec le travail productif, du renforcement des rapports entre éducation scolaire et éducation extrascolaire, du développement de l'enseignement technique et pro- fessionnel, de la réflexion sur le développement futur de l'éducation et les modifications de son contenu, de l'évolution de l'éducation physique et du sport, du rôle de l'enseignement supérieur dans la démocratisation de l'éducation et dans le développement socio-économique et culturel et de l'éducation relative à l'environnement et aux phénomènes de population.
41.42 Je me réjouis de constater que le Directeur général de l'Unesco a accordé une attention sans précédent au rôle des sciences sociales dans le développement national et international, d'autant que cette discipline scientifique peut exercer une action directe sur la perception et la solution des problèmes et sur la recherche de voies correspondant aux valeurs et aux voeux de chaque nation.
41.43 L'Unesco doit mettre à profit les progrès réalisés en matière de sciences sociales dans des domaines d'activité tels que le désarmement, la paix, les droits de l'homme, les problèmes de la jeunesse, la condition de la femme, les questions de population, les problèmes liés aux sociétés multinationales, aussi bien que dans la détermination des objectifs, la préparation des activités des programmes et le fonctionnement des mécanismes interdisciplinaires et intersectoriels de l'Unesco.
41.44 Monsieur le Président, Excellences, Mesdames, Messieurs, je termine en adressant mes meil- leurs voeux à tous les participants à la Conférence générale pour qu'ils réussissent à élargir la communauté internationale afin d'atteindre les objectifs de l'Unesco et à réaliser le consensus sur les programmes constructifs de l'Organisation à l'avenir. Merci, Monsieur le Président.
42. Le PRESIDENT .- Je remercie le chef de la délégation de l'Iran et je donne la parole à S. Exc. M. Mario Pedini, ministre de l'instruction publique et chef de la délégation de l'Italie.
43.1 M. PEDINI (Italie).- Monsieur le Président, permettez-moi de vous exprimer, au nom de la délégation italienne, mes félicitations les plus sincères pour votre élection à la présidence de la Conférence générale de l'Unesco. Nos félicitations vont aussi aux vice-présidents et aux présidents des commissions et des comités qui vous assisteront dans la tâche si importante qui vous été confiée.
43.2 Monsieur le Président, la Conférence générale de l'Unesco offre à la communauté internationale une occasion exceptionnelle, celle de réunir dans la même assemblée des hommes qui, partout dans le monde, s'occupent d'éducation, de science et de culture, à qui il est demandé de se prononcer sur les grands problèmes qui se posent aujourd'hui à l'humanité.
43.3 Il est vrai que nous sommes tous des représentants d'Etats membres et que la contribution de chacun de nous se fera à partir de notre expérience, de notre spécificité nationale, de notre identité ‘spirituelle et culturelle. Mais il est vrai aussi, Monsieur le Président, que cette assemblée qui offre la possibilité d'une atmosphère unique nous permet de dépasser nos différences et de parler, par- delà la conjoncture politique et économique, non seulement au nom des pays auxquels nous apparte- nons, mais en tant que membres de la grande famille mondiale des hommes et des cultures. D'ailleurs, la nature même des sujets et des textes que le Conseil exécutif propose aux chefs des délégations comme thèmes de réflexion pour le débat général - que ce soit l'évolution mondiale dans les domaines de compétence de l'Unesco ou la contribution de cette Organisation à l'instauration d'un nouvel ordre économique international - nous invite à nous placer dans cette perspective.
43.4 Monsieur le Président, l'analyse des problèmes de la société tels qu'ils se présentent aujour- d'hui a été esquissée par le Directeur général dans sa "postface" au Projet d'ajustements au Plan a moyen terme, et je dirai qu'il s'agit d'une analyse sobre et concrète.
43.5 Je me permettrai simplement de faire quelques remarques. Je crois en premier lieu pouvoir constater que cette vingtième session de la Conférence générale se déroule à une époque où l'on tente au moyen de la politique et de la diplomatie d'apporter une solution à des conflits et à des situations qui depuis trop longtemps menacent la paix internationale. Nous sommes persuadés comme vous tous, Mesdames et Messieurs, que l'absence de conflits militaires ne suffit pas, même si elle est la condition préalable à l'établissement de la paix. Elle ne suffit pas pour nous permettre de dire que la détente internationale est définitivement acquise, car nous ne pouvons ignorer le danger que représentent l'insécurité et l'instabilité dans le monde. Il nous appartient donc d'en tirer les consé- quences et de travailler davantage à en ancrer l'idée dans la conscience des hommes. Il est en outre de notre devoir d'exprimer notre solidarité et nos encouragements à tous ceux qui oeuvrent aujour- d'hui en faveur de la paix.
43.6 Un deuxième élément qui n'est peut-être pas assez mis en évidence dans les documents présen- tés est, à notre avis, le fait que la communauté internationale prend de plus en plus conscience des
516    droits et des devoirs des peuples, de leur étroite interdépendance et de la nécessité de la solidarité et de la concertation pour faire face aux grands problèmes de l'humanité tels que la misère, la mal- nutrition, l'ignorance et la maladie. Et cela, malgré les égoïsmes, les préjugés de toutes sortes, la peur de l'innovation qui existe encore dans toutes les sociétés au niveau national, sectoriel ou indi- viduel. Mais je crois qu'au niveau de la conscience profonde, l'idée du destin commun et indissociable de l'humanité est en train de s'enraciner dans l'esprit des hommes et ne devrait pas tarder à porter ses fruits.
43.7 Monsieur le Président, la question qui nous est posée est la suivante : quelle contribution pouvons-nous apporter, dans les domaines de compétence de l'Unesco, à la solution des problèmes majeurs de la société moderne ?
43.8 Sur le plan national, on peut dire qu'en raison de ses traditions historiques et de sa position géographique, l'Italie est sensible à la valeur universelle de la culture qui traduit le caractère natio- nal et spécifique de chaque pays. Dans cette optique, une expérience de décentralisation régionale est en cours en Italie : l'appui sur des valeurs autonomes locales rend possible la participation des individus et des groupes, enracinés dans cette culture locale, à une vie culturelle à l'échelle natio- nale. C'est ce qu'a bien montré la réunion organisée à Florence par la Commission italienne pour l'Unesco sur le thème "Education permanente et territoire". De même, la décentralisation de l'action de l'Unesco à l'échelle mondiale ne devrait jamais aboutir à une dispersion, mais plutôt à une mise en évidence des caractères nationaux dans le cadre des valeurs qui unissent les hommes au sein d'une seule communauté, dans laquelle chacun puisse connaître et comprendre autrui en contribuant à la richesse spirituelle commune.
43.9 Quant à l'Unesco, les excellents documents qui ont été élaborés nous proposent déjà un début de réponse ainsi qu'un programme d'action pour les années à venir. C'est un projet de grande ampleur qui est soumis à notre appréciation. Notre reconnaissance qui va à tous ceux qui ont par- ticipé à son élaboration - le Directeur général, ses collaborateurs, les membres du Conseil exécutif et un nombre difficilement évaluable d'experts et de spécialistes de tous les pays - ne nous dispense pas d'exercer, si nécessaire, une critique constructive.
43.10 Nous ne sous-estimons pas, par exemple, l'importance ni la complexité de la programmation par objectifs. Son adoption a traduit un choix fondamental auquel nous avons participé et dont nous assumons l'entière responsabilité. Il s'agissait d'une décision novatrice et, par nature, expérimentale. Nous n'avons certainement pas l'intention de la remettre en question ; mais nous demandons dans quelle mesure son application pratique a permis d'atteindre pleinement tous les buts que nous nous étions fixés.
43.11 A notre avis, l'approche actuelle qui met sur le même plan tous les objectifs, et l'impossibilité qui en découle de définir un ordre de priorité, ont rendu peut-être plus difficile l'exercice d'une fonction essentielle pour tout individu et pour toute organisation : l'exercice du droit de choisir. Or, cette fonction est d'autant plus importante que c'est de son exercice que dépendent les structures administratives et opérationnelles, les méthodes de travail ainsi que l'utilisation rationnelle des res- sources humaines et financières dont l'Unesco dispose.
43.12 Cette situation a conduit à la nécessité de concentrer les activités et les programmes, question qui a été déjà évoquée à plusieurs reprises devant cette assemblée et qui a fait l'objet d'initiatives précises de la part de certains Etats membres. Nous y sommes favorables et nous formons le voeu qu'en tirant parti de l'expérience acquise lors de l'application des décisions adoptées à Nairobi, cette Conférence réussisse, tout en se maintenant dans le cadre du Plan à moyen terme, à axer les pro- grammes autour d'un nombre plus limité d'objectifs.
43.13 Je suis persuadé que cette démarche se révélera féconde et apportera un nouveau souffle à l'Organisation. Je crois également que cette nouvelle approche, qui ne vise pas à appauvrir les contenus du programme - bien au contraire ! - apportera une solution satisfaisante aux problèmes que pose un budget dont le montant ne cesse de croître, ce qui n'est pas sans créer de graves soucis à nos gouvernements.
43.14 D'ailleurs, la nécessaire concentration du programme demandée par la Conférence générale à sa dix-neuvième session, ainsi que la nécessaire perspective globale souhaitée par le Directeur géné- ral dans la postface du Plan à moyen terme, ne peuvent découler que d'un choix politique fondamen- tal qui exalte le rôle irremplaçable de l'Unesco dans la communauté internationale. Rôle irremplaçable qui revient à l'Unesco de par sa vocation éthique, de par la raison profonde qui a présidé à sa naissance : "élever, comme il est dit dans l'Acte constitutif, les défenses de la paix dans l'esprit des ommes".
43.15 L'Unesco, Monsieur le Président, ne peut pas se limiter à élaborer des programmes éducatifs plus ou moins. valables, plus ou moins traditionnels, des programmes scientifiques et culturels qui pourraient aussi bien être réalisés par les Etats membres. Le programme relatif à l'éducation de l'Unesco, les programmes scientifique et culturel et les programmes relatifs aux sciences sociales et à l'information doivent reposer sur l'idée de la paix ; ils doivent "élever les défenses de la paix dans l'esprit des hommes".
43.16 La constitution d'un groupe de réflexion, prévue dans le programme, qui aura pour tâche d'aider à définir le cadre général et le plan détaillé d'une étude prospective de la participation de l'Unesco à l'élaboration des stratégies du nouvel ordre économique international et de la troisième Décennie des Nations Unies pour le développement, est une initiative que nous apprécions hautement et que nous soutenons.
43.17 Monsieur le Président, l'un des mérites de l'Unesco réside dans sa capacité de focaliser certains problèmes qui se posent à la société moderne - sur le plan national aussi bien que sur le plan inter- national -, de s'efforcer de mieux les connaître en vue de fournir aux Etats membres des instruments capables d'y apporter une solution. C'est là le but de ce qu'on appelle l'action normative de l'Orga- nisation, dont le mérite est de permettre la mise au point de textes d'une haute valeur scientifique et juridique qui reflètent la "communis opinio" de la grande majorité, voire de l'unanimité, des Etats membres. Essayer d'élaborer des déclarations de principe sur des sujets dont l'analyse est insuf- fisante et à propos desquels les opinions des Etats membres seraient profondément divergentes nuirait au prestige de cette Organisation.
43.18 Au sujet des problèmes de la communication, je dirai que l'excellent rapport intérimaire ‘qu'a élaboré la Commission d'étude présidée par M. MacBride et qui met en lumière l'extrême complexité de cette question, fournit abondante matière à réflexion à nos gouvernements. Les questions de la communication font se rencontrer, et parfois s'affronter, toutes les exigences de nos sociétés : la liberté tout court, la liberté d'expression, les impératifs du développement, le droit à sa propre personnalité et à son identité. La Commission d'étude n'essaie pas de fournir une synthèse ou de suggérer une réponse, et elle ne nous promet pas d'être en mesure de le faire au terme de son mandat. La question reste donc ouverte et le débat devra se poursuivre dans nos pays et au sein de cette Organisation qui reste un lien privilégié de discussion et d'échange d'idées.
43.19 Par contre, nous avons suivi avec inquiétude les stades successifs de l'élaboration du Projet de déclaration sur les organes d'information. C'est un processus qui dure depuis plusieurs années et qui a abouti sur un texte qui, bien que meilleur que celui qui avait été soumis à la session de Nairobi, appelle encore de sérieuses réserves. Ce qui nous préoccupe le plus, en effet, c'est l'idée qui trans- paraît dans les dispositions du projet de déclaration, l'idée qu'on puisse imposer aux moyens de communication de masse une finalité autre que celle de recueillir et distribuer l'information. Si noble que soit cette finalité, nous ne saurions accepter cette idée qui implique forcément un élément de contrainte, voire de censure de la presse, portant ainsi atteinte au principe de la liberté d'expres- sion qui est partie intégrante et instrument indispensable denotre ordre démocratique.
43.20 Nous souhaitons donc que les contacts et les consultations en cours entre les différents groupes permettent d'élaborer un texte de déclaration qui préserverait ce principe et qui mettrait en relief par ailleurs l'idée que les moyens de grande information peuvent dans nos sociétés jouer un rôle dans la promotion des idéaux de paix. Une telle déclaration, approuvée par consensus, renforcerait le prestige et l'autorité de cette Organisation et créerait les conditions nécessaires à une action efficace de sa part.
43.21 Monsieur le Président, les limites de temps que, dans votre sagesse, vous avez imposées aux interventions dans le débat de politique générale m'ont peut-être amené à mettre l'accent sur certains aspects de la vie de l'Organisation qui exigent un approfondissement conceptuel ou un réexamen méthodologique.
43.22 Je vous prie de voir dans ce fait la preuve de l'intérêt que nous portons à l'Unesco et de l'importance que nous attribuons au rôle qu'elle joue dans le développement de notre société.
43.23 Sur cette note, Monsieur le Président, je voudrais conclure les quelques remarques que je vous ai soumises en tant que contribution de la délégation italienne au débat de politique générale. La session vient de commencer. Un travail encore long nous attend. Je peux vous assurer, Monsieur le Président, que la délégation italienne y participera avec sérieux et dévouement et n'épargnera aucun effort pour que la Conférence, sous votre direction, se déroule dans un climat de compréhen- sion et se termine avec le succès escompté par la communauté internationale. Je vous remercie.
44. Le PRESIDENT .- ; Je remercie le chef de la délégation de l'Italie et je donne la parole a S. Exc. M. Jan-Erik Wikstróm, ministre de l'éducation et des affaires culturelles et chef de la délégation de la Suède.
45.1 Mr. WIKSTRÔM (Sweden): Mr. President, first of all, Sir, my congratulations upon your election. On behalf of the Nordic countries, Denmark, Finland, Iceland, Norway and Sweden, may we also congratulate Namibia on having been elected to membership of our Organization. We look forward to the time, hopefully very soon, when a free and independent Namibia can join in our work.
45.2 -In his introductory speech to this Conference a few days ago, the Director-General rightly referred to a number of issues of concern to all of us. They range from the financial and administra- tive problems of this Organization, to the major issues facing mankind in the decades ahead. I agree with much of what he said in this wide perspective.
45.3 This world is one of interdependence, the Director-General said, but it is not one of solidarity. I understood him to say, that gaps between nations and groups of nations, and between groups of people within nations, are intolerably wide. Profound changes are required both at the international and national levels. Many of these changes can come about only as a result of each country's own determination and the mobilization of its own resources, but indeed the international community has contributions to make.
45.4 As I see it, this Conference is called upon to determine what Unesco can do and should do to promote change, to formulate goals, to increase awareness and determination, to assist in the mobiliza- tion of resources, both nationally and internationally.
45.5 Unesco has done much in this regard over the years and is rightly given credit for its action. A tremendous build-up in education in most countries has delivered hundreds of millions of people from the scourge of ignorance and brought them into contact with the sources of knowledge. In this endeavour Unesco has a stake of no small importance. In the field of science many great achievements, such as international research programmes in hydrology and geology, can be ascribed to Unesco initiatives. The Director-General in his speech referred to a number of Unesco contributions to the development of culture, and I know that he himself has played an important role in many of these activities.
45.6 And yet, as he underlined repeatedly, for the new international order to come about, an order characterized by justice and equity and equal opportunity, a great deal more is required from this Organization. Indeed, the founders of Unesco imposed a formidable task upon it, and it would not be fair to say that they, or the present membership, have proved willing to provide resources commensurate to the magnitude of the task. "If you desire the end, you provide the means", the Director-General said in his speech last Thursday. I am afraid that, like myself as a national Minister for Education and Culture, he will admit on reflection that sometimes international as well as national assemblies want more ends to be met than they provide the means for. They expect you to do the impossible, and at times you manage to do it.
45.7 The road to achievements beyond expectations requires a good deal of bending and manoeuver- ing. I repeat what I have said before in this Conference. Unesco, in order to remain important and to become more important, has to review its priorities and concentrate on the most essential among its excessive number of tasks.
45.8 I was glad to learn that the Director-General, although he lacked time to dwell on this subject in his introductory speech, will return to it in the course of the Conference. The Swedish delegation has presented a draft resolution on a concentration of Unesco's programme. It is aimed at ensuring a discussion at this Conference, which would result in concrete guidelines for the Director-General in his planning for the future.
45.9 I am well aware that any priority-setting exercise is painful, because you have to say no to a good many things, some of them good things, in order to be in a position to say yes to a few, but more important things. We have some ideas about priority areas which in our opinion should corres- pond to the content and direction of a new international order. The Director-General referred to some of them in his speech when he introduced the paper that he has entitled "Postface", containing Draft Adjustments to the ongoing Medium-Term Plan of Unesco (1977-1982).
45.10 In this short intervention I shall elaborate on two priority areas - education and communication. The first is education and I strongly support the Director-General when in his "Postface" he says this: "Despite the considerable progress made over the last few decades, education inequalities continue to give rise to serious concern ... It is therefore a matter of priority to redouble efforts in favour of the democratization of education and the elimination of inequalities".
45.11 For my part I am fully convinced, and my conviction is based on experience in my own country, that education is at the root of all development. It represents the beginning of the road to productive employment and material prosperity, to health, to culture, to participation and equality. Indeed education is not only for children and young people.
45.12 We may remind ourselves, however, that we are now at the threshold of the International Year of the Child, as proclaimed by the United Nations. It is worth reflection that no less than half of the population of the world is below 19 years of age. The challenge of this era is great: how are we going to respond to the demands of this new generation?
45.13 I for one, Mr. President, feel that this conference must not accept the statement that I find in the same "Postface" and which says, that "the absolute number of illiterate people is still about
800 million, and ... there is little hope of reducing this number in the near future". Let us join forces in opposing such a prediction and in proving it unnecessarily pessimistic! Calculations have been made within the World Bank on the costs of a much more aggressive approach over the next 20 years, aiming at the eradication of illiteracy and the other evils that constitute the worst forms of world poverty. These costs must not be considered prohibitive, as they are based on essential requirements for the kind of development that all nations have agreed upon. Unesco should have as one of its priority aims for the next development decade to assist governments in mobilizing the ingenuity, the political will and the funds needed to promote planning for development, and to imple- menting the plans.
45.14 It follows from what I am saying, that I support strongly the main lines of the literacy pro- gramme as presented to this Conference. I see in it a good example of the kind of review of priorities that I am advocating.
45.15 May I recall here, Mr. President, that the majority of the world's illiterates are girls and women. If we want to take practical measures to eradicate discrimination between the sexes, and I take it that we do, we could do no better than start by a decisive attack on illiteracy.
45.16 1 also wish to take this opportunity to express my Government's sincere appreciation of the devotion to the furtherance of the cause of human rights of Unesco and its Director-General. During the last few years, the role of the Organization in this respect has been well defined, and the efficacy of its action has improved. This is true of standard-setting activities as well as individual
519    cases. The situation in Southern Africa is a special case in point. We, the Member States, should assist the Director-General to intensify further the actions of Unesco to support the peoples of Southern Africa in their fight against apartheid.
45.17 In the struggle against discrimination in all respects, few things are as important as obtaining a new order in the field of information and communication. News collection and dissemination and the means of public debate represent an area, where the imbalances between groups of people and between nations are just as obnoxious as they are obvious.
45.18 We are convinced that the free press has played a very important role in furthering justice and social and cultural equality in our society, thus, also, contributing to economic development. The right and the real opportunity to speak - and to speak up against the powerful without fear of reprisals - must be afforded not least to the underprivileged, for whom it is a weapon in their rightful struggle for human dignity and for better standards of life. Everybody agrees, I am sure, that one's own group should have a wide range of freedom of expression. However, this freedom also implies that we must uphold the right of our opponents to the same freedom. Only when one accepts that a political opponent has that same freedom, to the same extent and degree, only then is the credibility of claims to adherence to the principle of freedom of expression proven.
45.19 It is not enough, however, to eliminate legal obstructions blocking the exercise of freedom of expression. There are economic, social and cultural obstructions that must be abolished. No country is sufficiently advanced in this respect. Unesco is an important forum for the exchange of experience in this field.
45.20 The Swedish Government places great hopes on Unesco as a freedom fighter for those who are deprived of their human right to read and write and print. But this positive perspective should not be blurred by the adoption of a Declaration which could be interpreted as a betrayal of those who are in greatest need of the support of the international community: I refer to imprisoned journalists of many countries and other opponents of their national rulers, who are exposed to the risk of being persecuted and tortured for having expressed dissident opinions: I refer to large groups of ordinary men and women who long for a rich flow of news and views instead of propaganda.
45.21 By this statement, I also recall the imbalance in the news flow that exists between the develop- ing and the industrialized countries. Unesco must do its part in the struggle to correct this imbalance, and it should not yield to the kind of biased reporting to which Unesco and its Director-General have sometimes been exposed. It must fight it through the media, thus availing itself of the freedom of debate for which the Organization stands.
45.22 We are in the course of studying carefully the recent interim report of the MacBride Com- mission, which helps us by illuminating the complex nature of the communication issue. Meanwhile, Sweden is prepared to take concrete measures in support of Unesco action in this field. As the Director-General announced in his introductory speech, Sweden and other Nordic countries are prepared to contribute substantial funds to African regional programmes aimed at reducing the imbal- ances that I referred to a moment ago. We sincerely hope that other countries will join in this endeavour to correct an imbalance also in the budget of this Organization.
45.23 Mr. President, I have elaborated somewhat on two issues that should be given priority in the Unesco programme of the forthcoming years. There are, of course, many other important aspects of Unesco's programme which could have been stressed - rural development, endogenous development, the promotion of equality between men and women and so on. Those will be taken up by my delega- tion in the various commissions.
45.24 Let me end by assuring you of the active and substantial support of my country for decisive action by this Organization in fighting for the goals set by the founding fathers of our Organization, adapted to the needs of today and tomorrow. In so doing we will contribute to the peaceful construc- tion of a new international order where justice prevails within as well as between the nations of the world.
46. Le PRESIDENT.- 1 : Je remercie le chef de la délégation de la Suéde et je donne la parole a S. Exc. le Dr Daniel Darracq, ministre de l'éducation et de la culture et chef de la délégation de 1'Uruguay.
(47.1) M. DARRACQ (Uruguay).- (Traduit de l'espagnol.) Monsieur le Président, Monsieur le Directeur général, Messieurs les délégués, Mesdames et Messieurs Monsieur le Président, la délégation de I'Uruguay tient á vous exprimer, tout d'abord, la vive satisfaction que lui cause votre élection á la présidence de la vingtieme session de la Conférence générale de 1'Unesco, d'une part, parce qu'elle reconnait vos indiscutables mérites personnels, d'autre part, parce qu'elle garde présente à l'esprit l'importance de votre pays et de votre région, dans le passé comme dans le présent de l'Organisation. Nous saluons les nations qui nous ont rejointes à cette session, unissant ainsi leurs efforts à ceux déployés par l'Unesco depuis plus de 30 ans. La délégation de l'Uruguay souhaite en outre, Monsieur le Président, évoquer ici la figure de Jomo Kenyatta, président défunt du Kenya, qui fut le sage amphi- tryon de la Conférence générale à sa dix-neuvième session, 1976. Et en évoquant la personnalité de l'illustre homme d'Etat africain, nous faisons nôtres et nous appliquons ici, à Paris, les principes d'harmonie qui inspirèrent, grâce à lui, les travaux de la Conférence de Nairobi.
(47.2) Mes premières paroles seront pour souligner la hiérarchie entre le Projet de programme et de budget et les documents de travail annexes, présentés par le Conseil exécutif et le Directeur général. Ces divers textes mettent en évidence le judicieux critère dont s'est inspirée l'Unesco pour s'éloigner progressivement de l'esprit académique qui avait présidé à sa conception pour devenir un organisme opérationnel, cohérent et efficace, composé d'experts à la vision universelle.
(47.3) Sans préjudice des opinions que la délégation de mon pays portera sur les principaux thèmes du programme, au sein des commissions compétentes, je veux, de cette tribune, exprimer d'ores et déjà quelques appréciations de caractère général. Les idées avancées en faveur d'un nouvel ordre économique international doivent aller au-delà des seules considérations économiques, pour que l'objectif principal soit toujours et dans tous les domaines, l'homme, l'homme universel, mais d'une universalité qui plonge ses racines dans les particularités du peuple auquel il appartient et dans son intangible souveraineté. Dans la mesure où ce problème transcendental concerne l'Amérique latine, l'Uruguay continuera à apporter la plus grande contri- bution possible à l'étude des facteurs sociaux qui le conditionnent.
(47.4) La législation uruguayenne est imprégnée d'un sentiment profond d'adhésion à l'application et au respect des droits de l'homme, envisagés dans leur acception la plus large et qui comprennent, de ce fait, le droit au développement ; c'est dans l'intérêt de celui-ci que le gouvernement a encouragé la réalisation de grands travaux en faveur du progrès matériel, comme ceux destinés à mettre à profit les possibilités hydro-électriques du pays et à utiliser sur le plan industriel ses ressources de base. L'Uruguay s'efforce, en outre, au maximum d'intensifier la production de ses biens de consommation traditionnels, en favorisant la recherche scientifique relative à l'industrie agro-pastorale, sans préjudice de celle qui a lieu dans d'autres
523    domaines, et notamment dans le domaine universitaire, auquel est accordée toute l'importance que mérite sa contribution au progrès des différents aspects du développement de la technologie.
(47.5) Toutes les manifestations de la culture uruguayenne traduisent l'idéal de la paix universelle, de l'antibellicisme, de la compréhension internationale et de la solidarité humaine. Ses écrivains, ses philosophes, ses juristes et ses hommes politiques les plus renommés ont contribué par leurs oeuvres et leur activité publique à affermir, dans notre pays, le principe de l'égalité des peuples et des races, de leur liberté et de leur indépendance. La culture uruguayenne possède un caractère national défini et offre, en même temps, des preuves évidentes de son intérêt pour l'universalité de la pensée et le destin des nations du monde ; elle manifeste une large tolérance pour toutes les idées, a clairement conscience de ce que doivent être les souverainetés nationales et adhère fermement au principe de la non-intervention. La science et la culture, au sens le plus large, n'ont pas de patrie ; elles font partie d'un patrimoine commun, mais les traits parti- culiers, les traditions et l'histoire qui nourrissent l'esprit de chaque nationalité doivent être respectés par les autres et préservés avec dévotion.
(47.6) L'Uruguay a investi des sommes très importantes pour éviter que ne soient perdues on dispersées les valeurs représentatives de son passé historique. Citons, à titre d'exemple, le cas du Projet de sauve- garde du site archéologique de Salto Grande, que le gouvernement de l'Uruguay exécute dans le cadre du Programme de participation de l'Unesco et avec la collaboration de diverses nations amies. Il ne s'agit pas seulement de sauvegarder un passé lointain lié aux origines mêmes de l'homme américain, mais aussi d'un effort - rarement tenté - pour intégrer harmonieusement dans un environnement naturel, considéré comme un écosystème, un ouvrage nécessitant une technologie avancée tel qu'un barrage hydro-électrique. Le gouvernement a procédé, en outre, à la restauration de nombreux monuments et publié d'abandantes sources documentaires permettant d'étudier la genèse de la nationalité uruguayenne. Il apportera son soutien le plus ferme à toutes les initiatives qui pourront être prises au sein de l'Unesco en vue de contribuer aux travaux menés par les peuples libérés du régime colonial pour retrouver l'écho de leur lointain passé et redécouvrir leurs chemins oubliés, leurs traditions, les expressions de l'intelligence et de la sensibilité de ceux qui furent leurs prédécesseurs dans les temps les plus reculés. J'estime que la coopération internationale doit être renforcée par l'application des instruments existants ; pour que ceux-ci soient efficaces, il est indis- pensable que l'esprit qui les anime imprègne la conscience collective de chaque peuple, afin qu'il considère leur mise en oeuvre comme un de ses devoirs essentiels.
(47.7) Monsieur le Président, nous avons noté avec satisfaction la façon dont le Directeur général, confor- mément aux grandes lignes fixées par les Etats membres, poursuit la décentralisation des bureaux et centres régionaux, ainsi que les dispositions prévues dans le Projet de programme et de budget pour stimuler le développement de ces organes. A cet égard, je tiens à exprimer ici la satisfaction que cause à mon pays le fait d'être le siège de l'un des plus anciens bureaux régionaux de l'Unesco : je veux parler du Bureau régional de science et de technologie pour l'Amérique latine et les Caraïbes, qui a commencé à fonctionner à Montevideo en 1949 et qui a accompli et continue d'accomplir, depuis près de 30 ans, une tâche de grande importance.
(47.8) En ce qui concerne un autre aspect du programme, l'Uruguaÿ reconnaît les efforts déployés par le Directeur général pour favoriser un consensus sur la question de l'utilisation des moyens de communication de masse ; mais il agira, dans ce domaine, conformément à une longue et féconde tradition nationale, qui s'exprime dans les textes constitutionnels et juridiques de la République.
(47.9) L'action visant à améliorer la condition de la femme rencontre auprès du gouvernement de mon pays l'accueil le plus favorable. En Uruguay, l'homme et la femme jouissent d'une égalité absolue. Une législation avancée garantit à la femme tous les droits civiques et civils. Elle est électrice et éligible ; elle a accès à toutes les carrières publiques, à tous les échelons de la formation universitaire et à l'exercice de toutes les professions.
(47.10) En ce qui concerne la diffusion de la culture à l'intention du grand public, nous estimons qu'il convient d'accorder une importance particulière aux projets relatifs à l'initiation des enfants à la culture artistique et à l'histoire de l'humanité, ainsi qu'à ceux qui sont à même d'éveiller leur amour pour la nature. De même, nous considérons qu'il faut faire connaître l'histoire de l'Amérique en exécutant le projet de publication d'un ouvrage spécialement consacré à la période de formation des nations et au développement de celles-ci pendant le XXe siècle. Le panorama de l'histoire universelle offert par les grands ouvrages géné- raux publiés récemment souffre, à cet égard, d'une lacune immédiatement visible : l'histoire américaine postérieure à l'émancipation en est absente.
(47.11) Monsieur le Président, je manquerais aux devoirs de ma charge si j'omettais d'évoquer brièvement l'état de l'éducation en Uruguay. L'enseignement primaire est obligatoire, gratuit et laïque conformément à la Ley de Educacion Común du 24 août 1877. Les fonctions imparties à l'enseignement primaire en Uruguay sont les suivantes : assurer l'alphabétisation intégrale de la population ; renforcer l'usage de la langue mater- nele ; mettre en valeur le travail sous son aspect tant manuel qu'intellectuel, ainsi que sa signification sociale comme facteur de progrès de l'individu et de la collectivité ; fournir à l'enfant les éléments néces- saires à son épanouissement tant physique que mental et spirituel ; le rendre capable de réfléchir et de choisir face aux valeurs de la vie et de la culture ; orienter la communauté en général et les parents en particulier en ce qui concerne les principes de base de l'éducation familiale et les soins que nécessitent les enfants depuis leur plus jeune âge ; promouvoir et appliquer des programmes compensatoires et complémen- taires dans les milieux familiaux socialement défavorisés ; détecter les problèmes des enfants en matière de développement -sociophysique, afin de leur apporter une aide spéciale ; développer le sens des respon- sabilités chez les enfants, de façon à les rendre aptes à prendre seuls des décisions, au niveau individuel ou collectif, en accord avec une conscience morale et sociale élevée ; exalter les valeurs de la famille ; développer la conscience nationale dans l'esprit de l'indépendance du pays et de la coexistence humaine internationale ; préparer l'enfant à être le citoyen actif d'une démocratie considérée à la fois comme système politique et mode de vie ; lutter contre les préjugés et les vices sociaux en encourageant des activités destinées à développer l'intelligence ; stimuler l'esprit de recherche de l'enfant par l'observation, l'analyse et l'expérimentation ; assurer sa formation esthétique et l'aider à développer son expression personnelle ; promouvoir l'éducation nutritionnelle et sanitaire pour améliorer l'alimentation et la santé dès le plus jeune âge.
(47.12) Il ne s'agit pas là d'une aspiration, mais d'un mandat exprès qui est sanctionné par une loi en vigueur et dont mon pays s'acquitte pleinement. Comme vous pourrez le constater, Monsieur le Président, les tâches exposées coïncident avec les principes fondamentaux énoncés dans le Plan à moyen terme, approu- vé par la Conférence générale de l'Unesco.
(47.13) En Uruguay, l'école primaire est le service qui a la plus grande extension sur le plan national. Elle a pénétré profondément dans toutes les structures sociales. Selon le dernier recensement de 1975, le
524         taux d'alphabétisation est de 94,3 % pour l'ensemble du territoire. On compte 2.315 écoles publiques offi- cielles et 259 écoles privées, qui fonctionnent selon des principes assurant une ample liberté de l'ensei- gnement. Le nombre total des élèves inscrits s'élève à 386.556 et les enseignants sont 16.186. L'enseigne- ment secondaire est gratuit et obligatoire en vertu d'une disposition constitutionnelle datant de 1967. Un cycle de base commun de trois ans en précède un second, de deux ans, à orientation littéraire ou scienti- fique, au cours duquel l'élève définit sa vocation. En 1977, 137.315 élèves ont fait des études secondaires dans 135 lycées publics. Pendant la même période, 43.352 élèves ont reçu un enseignement technique dans les 85 écoles de l'Université du travail disséminées dans tout le pays. L'enseignement supérieur, qui est dispensé dans les facultés et les grandes écoles de l'Université de la République, est également gratuit, et les effectifs inscrits s'y sont élevés, en 1974, à 26.280. En 1977, les enseignants de l'Université de la République étaient au nombre de 2.958.
(47.14) Au cours des cinq dernières années, on a pris des dispositions pédagogiques, tenant compte des problèmes socio-économiques, afin de diminuer le taux des abandons en cours d'études dans l'enseignement secondaire. Des réformes substantielles ont été opérées pour améliorer la qualité et le rendement de l'ensei- gnement et on s'est attaché, en particulier, à créer de nouvelles filières adaptées aux besoins réels de développement du pays ; les modifications apportées aux plans d'études pour améliorer la formation des enseignants ont aussi donné des résultats très positifs. Le pays a effectué des investissements très impor- tants pour construire, agrandir et réparer des bâtiments servant à l'enseignement de tous les niveaux. En ce qui concerne l'enseignement supérieur, on a développé, dans toutes les disciplines, les cours de hautes études et les programmes de recherche scientifique. Les crédits destinés à l'enseignement représentent, dans notre pays, 24 % du montant total des traitements et salaires financés par le budget de l'Etat.
(47.15) Aux diverses époques de son histoire, l'Uruguay a accordé une importance primordiale aux problèmes de l'éducation et à son progrès à tous les niveaux. De même, il a encouragé hardiment les manifestations les plus élevées de la culture par une action soutenue de ses services officiels - dont la création remonte, dans certains cas, à une centaine d'années - par les publications d'Etat ou par les activités fécondes des orga- nismes privés subventionnés par le Ministère de l'éducation et de la culture. Le développement de l'éduca- tion et de la culture a exercé une grande influence sur la maturité spirituelle du peuple uruguayen, sur son aptitude à s'intégrer socialement, sur l'originalité de son évolution historique, sur l'aisance avec laquelle il a assimilé les courants d'immigration qui ont afflué vers notre territoire, ainsi que sur sa disposition naturelle et spontanée à se sentir solidaire du destin de tous les peuples et sur la sensibilité avec laquelle il perçoit les courants de la pensée universelle.
(47.16) Le pays que je représente conçoit les problèmes qui motivent ces réflexions à la lumière de certains principes généraux. Nous estimons que l'accès aux bienfaits de l'éducation et de la culture fait partie des droits attachés à la condition humaine. Tout homme naît avec le droit de savoir lire et écrire, de posséder un métier et, en outre, d'avoir la capacité et la possibilité de produire en vue de sortir de la pauvreté et de l'ignorance et de contribuer à élever sa condition. Les bienfaits immenses que procurent l'éducation, la science et la culture seront une réalité chaque fois que les Etats et les organismes internationaux concilie- ront la paix avec la sécurité sur le plan social, la liberté avec le principe de l'ordre - une liberté qui, grâce à l'éducation morale, soit capable de se discipliner elle-même - les droits naturels avec les devoirs, le bien-être économique avec l'amour du travail, enfin le progrès matériel avec le culte des valeurs spirituelles.
(47.17) Dans le même ordre d'idées, j'estime que les hommes de pensée, de science et de culture doivent fournir une réponse aux hommes d'action, aux questions et problèmes qui se posent dans le monde où nous vivons et où l'influence de la pensée scientifique sur le développement technique revêt le caractère d'un défi. Les conquêtes de la civilisation ne doivent pas servir des intérêts particuliers mais l'humanité.
(47.18) L'éducation doit préparer l'homme à recevoir les effets de la technologie et à les assimiler et en tirer parti de façon à rendre la vie plus supportable, à la préserver et l'ennoblir ; mais elle doit aussi empêcher que les excès de la technologie ne l'affaiblissent progressivement. Le développement matériel et la technologie risquent de créer un vide d'ordre spirituel. L'heure est arrivée de proclamer que le destin de la culture ne peut être livré à ceux qui, séduits par la magie de la technique, oublient que l'essentiel, nous le répétons, est toujours l'homme. Cette conviction inspire et renforce l'Uruguay dans son opposition aux courants qui tentent de nier la condition humaine.
(47.19) L'Uruguay est membre de l'Unesco depuis la fondation de celle-ci. C'est à Montevideo qu'a eu lieu, en 1954, la huitième session de la Conférence générale. L'Uruguay a suivi l'évolution de l'Organisation avec un intérêt particulier. Les immenses tâches que l'Unesco doit accomplir sont clairement définies : il n'est pas concevable qu'elle puisse s'écarter du champ d'action et des perspectives qui lui sont propres pour s'engager dans d'autres domaines. Le monde attend de l'Unesco la réponse qu'elle seule peut donner au sujet des problèmes qui relèvent de sa compétence spécifique. Son ‘image ne saurait être ternie par une tendance à la politisation qui débouche toujours sur des passions incomparables avec les principes essentiels de la culture. Elle doit, au contraire, refléter fidèlement ce qui est inscrit dans son Acte constitutif : "L'Organisation se propose de contribuer au maintien de la paix et de la sécurité en resserrant, par l'éduca- tion, la science et la culture, la collaboration entre nations". Souvenons-nous toujours de la spécificité de notre vaste champ d'action.
(47.20) Monsieur le Président, je formule le voeu que la mesure, la pondération et l'esprit de Nairobi orientent les débats de la présente session de la Conférence générale, occasion de rencontres et d'échanges facilitant la recherche de solutions dont le caractère conciliateur soit la garantie de leur efficacité au service de l'humanité.
48. Le PRESIDENT .- Je remercie le chef de la délégation de l'Uruguay et je donne la parole à S. Exc. M. Hans- Dietrich Genscher, ministre fédéral des affaires étrangères et chef de la délégation de la République fédérale d'Allemagne.
49.1 Mr. GENSCHER (Federal Republic of Germany) (Speech delivered in German, English text supplied by the delegation): Mr. President, distinguished delegates: I should like to extend to you, Mr. President, the congratulations of my delegation on your election to this high office. At the same time, I wish to assure you that my Government will do everything in its power to make this twentieth session of the General Conference of Unesco a success under your able guidance.
49.2 Ladies and gentlemen, we remember with reverence on this occasion the late President Kenyatta, highly respected by us all, who was our host at the previous General Conference of our Organization in Nairobi and in whom not only his own people but the whole world lost an outstanding statesman.
49.3 The purpose of our Organization, according to its Constitution, is to contribute to peace and security by promoting collaboration among the nations through education, science and culture. In this shrunken world, however, peace is no longer simply a state of non-war: nor can we any longer be content with merely preventing war. In fact, our task is to bring the countries of the world together for co-operation, so that they may respond jointly to the challenges of our time. Indeed, it is only through joint action that these challenges can be met.
49.4 The development of a global system of co-operation in a world of global interdependence imposes on our Organization an important, indeed a central, role, for it is here, in Unesco, that we are striving to lay the spiritual foundations of such a system.
49.5 "Wars", as the preamble to our Constitution states "begin in the minds of men". And that is where co-operation begins as well. Co-operation is not subject to technological constraints: it is in the minds of men that the future of mankind is determined.
49.6 Mr. President, it is obvious that in our complex world of more than 150 sovereign States, it is not through the domination of a few States that a stable system of co-operation can be achieved. It is equally obvious that any striving for domination is bound eventually to lead to the use of force, and that it is only on the basis of self-determination and equal rights for all nations that peaceful and lasting co-operation can develop. As far as the meaning of these principles in relation to Unesco's work is concerned, I should like to make two points.
49.7 In the first place, "equality" also means equality of cultures. Consequently, we must recog- nize a pluralistic world in which no State should be allowed to force a foreign ideology upon others. In this connection, let me emphasize, Mr. President, that my country advocates a world in which the nations themselves determine their political, economic and cultural way of life in free self-determination. We want a single world, but not a uniform one. Mankind needs diversity if its creative forces are not to evaporate. We need the specific contribution which each civilization can make towards the solution’ of the world's common problems.
49.8 Hence, our task in Unesco is a dual one: we want to enhance the knowledge of our mutual cultures and thus help promote international understanding; and at the same time we want to strengthen the cultural identity of the nations and to preserve mankind's cultural heritage in its diversity.
49.9 The world's equal cultures can only be held together by a strong spiritual bond: our common belief in human rights and in self-determination. Whether or not this belief becomes a reality depends on each individual Member State, and there is profound significance in the fact that Unesco, which is called upon to enhance the spiritual exchange between cultures, has also been assigned the funda- mental task of strengthening respect for human rights in all parts of the world.
49.10 My second point is that "equality" is not merely a formal concept. We must make it possible for all States to share in shaping our common future.
49.11 Mr. President, a fundamental task of the present generation is continuously to narrow the gulf which at present separates the rich countries from the poor. In this context we tend to think in the first instance of the economic gulf, yet the major cause of this gap in prosperity is the dis- parity in levels of education and training, in levels of knowledge, and in technological possibilities. It is one of Unesco's priority objectives to close this gap. Hence, it must solve the great task of stepping up economic and social development in the Third World, and of defeating hunger and want wherever they exist.
49.12 Mr. President, the Draft Programme and Budget for 1979-1980 (20 C/5) constitutes a syn- thesis of the wishes of more than 140 Member States. My Government considers it to be a good synthesis. Though we do not share each and every idea that it contains, we accept it in broad outline, and I should like to express to the Director-General and his staff the appreciation and gratitude of my Government for their work.
49.13 At the head of Unesco's list of targets in the Medium-Term Plan for 1977-1982 is the realiz- ation of human rights. Politics serve man - and where else should this apply more than in Unesco? As far as my country is concerned, I should like to point out with all clarity that by "human rights" we do not only mean the rights to personal freedom, but also economic, social and cultural rights. Freedom from fear, from distress and from ignorance are all part of the same concept.
49.14 Mr. President, a life worthy of man is only possible in a world where all these freedoms have become a reality. In December we shall be celebrating the thirtieth anniversary of the Universal Declaration of Human Rights. We are aware of the long way we still have to go to arrive at the world-wide realization of even the most elementary rights enshrined in that Declaration. Nevertheless, the driving force of history is the call of the people for the exercise of their human rights. This call will dominate the future. Those who violate human rights place themselves in opposition to the dignity of man. Though they may halt for a while the wheel of history in their own sphere of influence, they cannot bring it to a stop forever. They act against progress and are thus the real reactionaries of our time.
49.15 To help shape a future in which all mankind - regardless of race, sex, faith or political convictions - will see their demand for human rights fulfilled: this is a task in which Unesco has a special part to play. It does so in a dual manner: by educating people to respect human rights, and by advancing and protecting those human rights which fall within its own fields of competence. Education in respect for human rights goes hand in hand with education for the maintenance of peace. Both these tasks are referred to together in Unesco's education programmes. Both are also seen as a unit in the Universal Declaration of Human Rights, Article 26 of which states that: "Educa- tion shall be directed to the full development of the human personality and to the strengthening of respect for human rights and fundamental freedoms. It shall promote understanding, tolerance and friendship among all nations, racial or religious groups, and shall further the activities of the United Nations for the maintenance of peace". In a world threatened by existing and potential conflicts, education for the maintenance of peace is more necessary today than ever before. ”
49.16 Mr. President, in my country it is a supreme objective to educate the people for a life of peace. In 1973, the Regional Ministers of Education in the Federal Republic of Germany reaffirmed that it is incumbent on schools to foster a peaceful mentality in the spirit of international understand- ing. Any visitor to my country will recognize that the people want only one thing: to live in peace and to work for freedom, progress and social justice. The parties represented in the German Bundestag are of one mind on this point, and this also is the spirit in which our children grow up: respect and tolerance towards one's neighbour; respect and tolerance towards all nations, their cultures, their achievements and their characteristic features.
49.17 For a long time now we have endeavoured - and with success - to free our textbooks from the spirit of animosity between nations. Together with a large number of countries, and not least our former enemies, we have agreed on recommendations for a review and reform of textbooks. We shall continue with this task. But it grieves me that there are still countries that do not educate their people for peace, but sow "hatred" even in the hearts of children towards all those who do not share their own ideology. Whoever incites hatred of those who follow a different philosophy or who live a different life, or hatred of those who are different from himself, whoever incites people to hate other nations, or who educates young people in this spirit, sows the seeds of war.
49.18 Mr. President, Unesco and its National Commissions play a leading part in international pro- grammes for education in peace, and it is our view that this part should be strengthened even further. A major field of activity regarding human rights within the purview of Unesco is the realization of equal rights for women. Here no country, including my own, can be satisfied with the existing state of affairs. It is true that equal rights for women is a principle enshrined in most constitutions. But equal legal status is simply not enough. The aim must be practical realization of that equality in all spheres of life. And here we still find many shortcomings. This also applies, and in no small measure, to the field of education: the higher the educational qualifications, the smaller the proportion of women attaining them. This must be changed. We shall therefore give our special support to all Unesco programmes designed to help remove any existing discriminatory treatment of women, and indeed we have offered to host during the next two years two international Unesco conferences concerned with new initiatives for the improved technical and vocational training of girls and women. My Government also supports Unesco's aim to achieve the integration of women into the development process, and advocates development measures for the benefit of women.
49.19 One form of violation of human rights is racial discrimination. We endorse Unesco's Draft Declaration on Race and Racial Prejudice. We consider, however, that such a Declaration should not be burdened with problems that are alien to the subject.
49.20 We have succeeded through the Universal Declaration of Human Rights and the two Inter- national Covenants on Human Rights in codifying human rights in binding form for the whole world. The task ahead of us now is to establish international institutions and to devise procedures to ensure the effective protection of those rights, and in this connection it should be remembered that Unesco has developed a procedure within its field of competence which enables States, groups and individual persons to put complaints about violations of human rights before the Organization.
49.21 Mr. President, the Draft Programme and Budget for 1979-1980 contains a whole range of operative programmes in the field of education, natural and social sciences, as well as culture and communication. My country is playing an active part in these programmes because we know there is still an alarming contrast between scientific and technological possibilities on the one hand, and widespread poverty and ignorance on the other. Unesco's possibilities of helping to bridge this gap must be used to the full.
49.22 Both multilaterally and bilaterally, the Federal Republic of Germany advocates intensive scientific exchange, not least as a means of enriching our own culture and science. Our doors are therefore wide open to exchanges of students and scientists and the exchange of information. At present, some 50,000 foreign students are studying at our universities and colleges. More than half of them come from the developing countries, and many of these have received scholarships. Furthermore, a ares number of trainees and scholarship ‘holders are receiving practical training with firms and at schools.
49.23 The natural sciences are playing an increasingly important role in this exchange. This is reflected in the fact that the Executive Board of Unesco decided in the spring of this year to place greater emphasis on this sector.
49.24 Our involvement in international scientific and technological exchanges is governed by our conviction that achievements in this field must be accessible to all countries without discrimination.
527   There must be no technological colonialism. Every country must be able to choose technologies that are suitable to its own circumstances and needs. We therefore support the proposal in the Draft Programme and Budget that appropriate technologies be developed or existing technologies adapted to meet the needs of the developing countries.
49.25 Mr. President, the steadily accelerating development of technological and industrial civilization brings not only advantages but also dangers. Not the least of these dangers is the threat to our cultural heritage, whose loss must be prevented through our joint efforts. To preserve and cultivate the visible testimonies to the world of our forefathers is an important task of Unesco.
49.26 Mr. President, this Conference will be taking a major decision with regard to a Charter for Physical Education and Sport. I particularly appreciate the fact that for the first time at United Nations level, an attempt is being made to lay "down common principles for the necessary dialogue between governments and autonomous sports organizations.
49.27 The draft Charter emerging from this dialogue is seen as a basis for future world-wide co- operation in the field of sport, by helping intensify that co-operation; by eliminating existing difficul- ties in international sports relations and thus facilitating free exchanges beyond national frontiers; and by supporting sportsmen from the Third World, so that they may make a bigger contribution to international exchanges in sport.
49.28 I know that the independent sports associations in my country agree with what I say. They are independent of the State but their relationship with it is reflected in a spirit of partnership. We also agree with them that the Charter concerns amateur, and not professional sport. The latter is legitimate, but is of course governed by commercial interests, from which amateur sport should be kept free. But sport as a whole should be kept free from government control. Governments should promote sport, not control it.
49.29 Mr. President, I now come to one matter which - as in Nairobi two years ago - will feature prominently in our debates: the question of a declaration on the role of information media in the world. The Director-General has presented us with a draft text in this connection.
49.30 During our discussions, my delegation will be guided by the following considerations. In the first place, the free flow of information between peoples, which is one of the main objectives of this Organization, should be reciprocal and should take the form of exchange. There should be no one-way traffic. This reciprocity has not sufficiently materialized - neither between East and West, nor between North and South. But in each case the problem is different. In the East-West relation- ship, fully developed information organizations exist on both sides which have every technical and financial means of disseminating news and views throughout the world at their disposal. In this case, all that is needed to achieve reciprocity is a free flow of information with every citizen having access to it. The only problem in this relationship is that some countries severely restrict that freedom. In my country, every person can buy foreign newspapers and tune into any foreign radio broadcast without hindrance. In the Final Act of the Conference on Security and Co-operation in Europe, the signatory States made it their aim "to facilitate the freer and wider dissemination of information of all kinds". My country will persistently urge the pursuit of this aim by all the signa- tories. Free information will prevail. There can be no wall against the truth.
49.31 But in the North-South relationship, on the other hand, there is a second problem which gains prominence: the unequal capacity for disseminating information. Today, most information is transmitted by the news agencies and other media of the industrial countries in East and West. Thus the news and opinions about developing countries which people in the industrial countries read about, hear and see, come primarily from Western or Eastern media. Indeed, this also applies in many cases to information which people in the developing countries receive about other developing countries or indeed about their own country. In this relationship, therefore, the aim must be to ensure that the world is not divided up into "donors" and "consumers" of information. The aim must be to build up efficient news agencies and other information media in the developing countries, to make them more capable of playing an active part in the universal exchange of information.
49.32 The industrial countries must help in this process by providing technical and financial assist- ance. I would point out in this connection that my country supports the nations of the Third World both bilaterally and through its contribution to media projects of Unesco designed to develop their infrastructures in the field of communication. Since the last General Conference, it has provided assistance for 64 media projects in 38 countries of the Third World. My Government will maintain and increase this support. We are strongly in favour of a more balanced exchange of information between industrial and developing countries. This is also in our own interest. We want the people in the developing countries to be able to learn about our country from their own information as well. We want to receive more reports from journalists in the Third World about their own countries, and to learn more about those countries. Co-operation between North and South with the aim of constantly reducing the gap between rich and poor countries is the crucial international task of our time. The information media have an indispensable role to play in making all people aware of this.
49.33 This brings me, Mr. President, to the second fundamental consideration with regard to the proposed Declaration. I said in the beginning that the great mission of this age is to develop an order of peace and co-operation on the basis of equality. The press, radio, television and the other information media have an important role to play in this process. But they can only fulfil it in freedom and self-responsibility. Press and other information media must be free; governments should not and must not try to direct them. We are opposed to government control of theinformation and
528    opinions which the media disseminate. Governments should have no control over the media. Freedom of the press is part of the very substance of my country's Constitution. Without a free press, there can be no democracy. Without a free press, the individual's right to free information cannot be guaranteed. The right of every person to express his opinions freely and to receive information without hindrance is one of the basic rights of our Constitution, but it is also a fundamental human right in the international sense as well. Indeed, the very first General Assembly of the United Nations declared freedom of information to "the touchstone of all freedoms".
49.34 Mr. President, it will be clear from what I have said that my country would reject any draft Declaration which calls for State control of the information media or for so-called government responsi- bility for them. "To promote the free exchange of ideas by word and image" is one of the fundamental tasks which Unesco has been set by its Constitution. This Organization would be acting contrary to its own Constitution if it were now to advocate government monitoring and control of the flow of information, or that this be done under the cloak of government responsibility.
49.35 In thus expressing my firm support for freedom of information, I am by no means unaware that any freedom can be put to poor use, and indeed abused. This also holds true for freedom of the press. Such freedom consequently imposes a heavy responsibility on every individual journalist. Information can be true or misleading; it can be used merely for sensationalism or to provide genuine information; and it can be presented in order to enlighten or to disparage others. To seek to solve this problem through government control or, worse still, through censorship would be a totally unsuitable approach, and one pregnant with far more dangerous consequences: the danger of govern- ment manipulation of communication and opinion.
49.36 Mr. President, there is only one antidote to distorted information: plurality of information. Diversity of information and diversity of the media - these are the best and the only protection against distorted reporting and the manipulation of opinion. Only plurality makes objective opinion- forming possible.
49.37 Mr. President, the proposed Declaration on the media affects one of the central purposes of this Organization. The Director-General has rightly emphasized that such a Declaration needs the broadest possible basis of support. A Declaration adopted against the wishes of a group of Member States would prejudice co-operation in an important area of Unesco's work. We must therefore achieve consensus - or we must forego the Declaration. My delegation is willing to do its best to bring about such a consensus, but we are not prepared to support a Declaration which restricts the freedom of the press in any way. There is not too much freedom of the press in the world, but too little.
49.38 Mr. President, we are living in a pluralistic world. It is a world of different cultures. But on one thing we must agree: we must all be willing to look beyond our dissimilarities, and to co-operate on the basis of equality in the solution of common problems; and we must all pledge ourselves to a humane world in which the dignity and the rights of man are respected, protected and exercised. To help bring about that agreement, to lay the spiritual foundations for it - that is the foremost task of this Organization. Thank you, Mr. President.
50. Le PRESIDENT.- Je remercie le chef de la délégation de la République fédérale d'Allemagne et je donne la parole à S. Exc. le Dr Chrysostomos Sofianos, ministre de l'éducation et chef de la délégation de Chypre.
51.1 Mr. SOFIANOS (Cyprus): Mr. President, Your Excellencies, distinguished delegates, ladies and gentlemen, may I, in the first place, express to you the warm congratulations of my delegation and myself to you on your election to the presidency of the twentieth session of the General Conference. I am confident that under your leadership and with your expert knowledge of the problems and activities of Unesco, this Conference will achieve its objectives in a most satisfactory manner.
51.2 We cherish the memories of the creative work done within the framework of the nineteenth session of the General Conference, reflecting the spirit of Nairobi, under the wise guidance of your predecessor, Mr. Taaitta Toweett, to whom we extend our appreciation.
91.3 On behalf of my delegation, I express our deep gratitude to all members of this Conference for their spontaneous and sincere expressions of sympathy for the loss of Archbishop Makarios, President of the Republic of Cyprus, as well as for the recent death of our permanent delegate to Unesco, Ambassador Anastasios Leventis.
51.4 I am extremely happy to welcome to the Unesco family the four new members, namely Cape Verde, Comoros, Swaziland and Namibia. The forthcoming admission of Dominica to this Organization will offer a further occasion for rejoicing.
51.5 I would also like to pay tribute to the Director-General and the members of the Secretariat for their tireless efforts in preparing for this Conference, the Draft Programme and Budget (20 C/5) and, also, for their unremitting endeavours in implementing past decisions and resolutions.
51.6 The Draft Programme and Budget for 1979-1980, submitted to the Conference, is the product of much intellectual effort and I assert with confidence that it covers the major issues, educational, scientific and cultural development facing the world today. We view with great satisfaction the efforts of the Director-General to help solve a number of the current problems afflicting us at this time. Certainly, one of the most important of these problems, is the underdeveloped state of large
12 sections of the world, and, therefore, we fully subscribe to the priorities given in the Draft Programme and Budget to promoting development. Let me point, Mr. President, to the concomitant problem of human rights, which continues to be one of the most burning issues in the contemporary world. The issue is universal in the sense that every aspect of Unesco's activity is inextricably associated with the exercise of human rights. Indeed, the protection of human rights is the prerequisite to the carrying out of any policy bearing on material and cultural development. We deplore the fact that human rights are violated by those carrying out policies of colonialism, neo-colonialism, fascism, racialism, apartheid, foreign aggression and military occupation. My country has been one of the victims of such negative action, and the immense human and cultural damage caused has not as yet been repaired.
51.7 Education should be the most prominent human endeavour toward the promotion of human rights. In my country, education ranks as one-of the top priorities attracting the vital interest of government and people alike. In this respect, the Cyprus Government is fully aware of the new objectives corresponding to the profound changes in educational policies. Allow me to briefly describe the basic features of educational development in Cyprus.
51.8 Basically, educational action in Cyprus is conceived and formulated within the framework of individual and social requirements. In this way, two fundamental aims of education, successfully conceived and clearly stated by Unesco, self-fulfilment and social advancement, are simultaneously pursued. The fulfilment of these aims is identified with the expansion of education and the renova- tion of education systems expressed and pursued by a great number of Member States in their attempt to reduce educational inequalities. My country fully supports the policy of reduction of educational inequalities. Amost significant development, in this respect, is the constitutional commitment of the Government of Cyprus to accept the right to equal opportunities in education for all citizens. Specific aspects of this commitment are the provision of free and compulsory primary education since 1962, soon after the establishment of the Republic of Cyprus, and also, the provision of technical education on a non-fee paying basis, as well as the provision of free schooling for the first three years of secondary education since the school year 1972/1973. Thè recent provision of free pre-primary education in certain urban areas and our declared intention of further expanding this educational service, planning for establishing a university on the island, State support extended to Cypriot refugees, and other needy students abroad and the increasing availability of special education for handicapped individuals, provide ample evidence of the ongoing horizontal and vertical expansion of education despite the hard blow inflicted on our educational institutions and resources by the Turkish invasion of 1974.
51.9 As far as the democratization process is concerned, it is conceived and implemented in terms of both equality of opportunity of access and achievement. In this respect, the orientation of official educational policy is demonstrated by the strenuous government effort to improve the learning-teaching conditions for the less privileged sections of the population through a number of measures taken towards the reduction of environmental inequalities. Thus, the abolition of an early selection system, the intention to establish central-school units in the deprived rural areas, alongside with the improve- ment of the teacher/pupil ratio, the individualization of instruction in classroom and the wide partici- pation of parents, teachers and students in decision-making, tend to promote the process of democratization.
51.10 The promotion of out-of-school education is discernible in the character attributed to it by the Cyprus State. Thus, the various forms of non-formal education are interrelated with formal education within the framework of a lifelong education. Indicators of this official policy are institu- tions, such as the Adult Education Centres, the classes for the illiterate, the Apprentice Training Scheme, the institutes for foreign languages and other evening institutions, the in-service programmes for headmasters and teachers and schools for parents.
51.11 My Government's effort to encourage and promote the fullest development of all members of the community, without exception is, unfortunately, severely frustrated by the continuing Turkish occupation, whereby the moral and legal right to education of Cypriot children, especially of refugee and "enclaved" children, is impaired. The Government of the Republic of Cyprus regrets to state that it is still prevented from guaranteeing this right to every person throughout its national territory. In fact, it is prevented from doing so in 40 per cent of its territory which is still occupied by the Turkish forces. No propaganda or allegation can deny the fact that the Turkish Army still occupies
40 per cent of Cyprus, one-third of the population of Cyprus having been turned into refugees in their own country. Thus, Turkey is disregarding all the relevant resolutions of the United Nations on the Cyprus problem. And no reasonable man can claim that foreign aggression and foreign occupa- tion constitutes an act of protection of human rights when all the communities on the island suffer so much from this aggression and this occupation.
51.12 In my address to the nineteenth session of the General Conference of Unesco, I described briefly the damage which the cultural heritage of Cyprus had suffered since the Turkish invasion of our island in 1974. It is with profound sorrow that I have to say that the situation is unchanged. Cypriot antiquities from registered private collections, some of which had already appeared in scholarly publications, have appeared in the European market and the Cyprus Government had no other choice but to purchase some of them indirectly from the looters.
51.13 The illicit traffic of antiquities continues in the occupied zone. Ancient pottery, Byzantine icons and other objects of our cultural heritage are still being sold in the back streets of the occupied section of Nicosia.
51.14 The ancient monuments and other cultural property in the occupied part of Cyprus remain inaccessible to the legal authorities of the Republic of Cyprus. As a result of abandonment and weathering they suffer considerable damage and we have reports that some of the excavated pre- historic sites, such as the neolithic settlement at Ayios Epiktitos, have suffered irreparable damages. Icons and books of great artistic and historical value in the occupied territory now run the risk of complete loss because they remain unguarded in unsuitable places.
51.15 The Government of the Republic of Cyprus is extremely concerned about this situation, not only because it is our cultural heritage which is in danger, but also because we consider this heri- tage as belonging to the whole world. In a letter to the Director-General of 25 October 1977 the Government of Cyprus described the situation in detail, with particular emphasis on the pillage of churches.
51.16 The Director-General of Unesco has always shown interest and concern about the problem of the cultural heritage of Cyprus and in his desire to find a solution, he sent to Cyprus, late in June
1978, two envoys who studied ways and means of establishing a permanent mission of Unesco in Cyprus. Unfortunately, until now, no concrete result has been achieved and the cultural heritage of Cyprus runs the same grave risks as before. We sincerely hope that the Director-General will continue his efforts toward the establishment of a permanent mission for which we extend our gratitude.
51.17 With regard to the programme of social action included in the Draft Programme and Budget, our delegation is extremely satisfied with the proposed endeavours to ensure concerted application of the social sciences toward clarifying major social and human problems and promoting action towards their solution.
51.18 We fully subscribe to the proposed stronger assertion of the presence of Unesco within the United Nations system in relation to aspects of human rights within the fields of its competence and in particular to the identification and clarification of what are designated as the "rights of solidarity", and to the promotion of fundamental research into human rights problems.
51.19 We have noted with satisfaction the emphasis laid on the historical treatment of social phenom- ena and the application of philosophical inquiry to several sectors. The adoption of the special Theme
3.35 will help to further the teaching of philosophy on a world scale, but also the overall and inter- disciplinary treatment of a number of human problems of special concern to Unesco.
51.20 Allow me, Mr. President, with respect to the programme in the social sciencés, to express the views of my Government on the problems pertaining to this field of study and research. A major issue in present world affairs is the building up of a just and stable international structure that would guarantee to all Member States the basic economic and social rights required for their free and sound development. The establishment of a new international economic order is certainly a prerequisite for the attainment of a viable international co-operation. Recognition of the legitimate aspirations of the developing countries is a sine qua non for promoting the solution of international problems and bringing about international peace and justice. Now, the promotion of a new international economic order cannot achieve the major objectives of mankind by itself. It has to be supported by the concomitant promotion of the social and cultural structures so as to meet the universal needs of education, justice and cultural and scientific development. Only by means of parallel action on both economic and socio-cultural levels will it be possible to achieve integral development.
51.21 On the question of the halting of the arms race we highly commend the role which Unesco has assumed in the international efforts for a complete and general disarmament. It is highly distressing that in a prospective new economic order more people in the world cannot afford the basic means of education and health and continue to live under conditions of utter deprivation. Cyprus though wounded and lame by the destructive effects of foreign aggression and occupation, is wholeheartedly committed to the idea of general and complete disarmament. The proposal of President Kyprianou before the Special Session of the United Nations General Assembly on Disarmanent last May for the demilitarization of the island, is an expression of our will to convert the present sad situation of Cyprus into one of peace, friendship and understanding among all Cypriots in accordance with the principles of the United Nations and Unesco.
51.22 The Cyprus Government is fully convinced of the substantial contribution that science and technology can make in the economic and social development of a country. Cyprus attributes much of its progress since independence in 1960, to infrastructural projects of a technological nature which covered among other fields, agricultural methods, water resources, ports and communication networks and technical education. It is generally recognized that the efforts toward recovery and reactivation of the economy of Cyprus, after the blow it received in 1974 when 40 per cent of its land and 70 per cent of its resources came under foreign occupation, are the result of its manpower potential.
51.23 The Government of Cyprus is aware of the value of and the need for formulating a science and technology policy to be integrated into its general and specific plans for economic and social development and appreciates the capital contribution to be made in this direction through appropriate management and upgrading of its scientific and technological resources.
51.24 In this respect, my Government expresses the wish that Unesco will offer every possible help m promoting the "Scientific Forum" which has been established within the framework of the Conference on Security and Co-operation in Europe at Helsinki (CSCE).
51.25 We share the widespread concern at the present imbalance in the distribution of knowledge and skills between the industrialized and the developing countries. In the wide interpretation of
531    human rights the governments of the world should include scientific and technological independence together with the rights for political and economic independence, as essential prerequisites for the well-being of all people.
51.26 Cyprus, like many other developing countries, aspires to achieve the highest possible rate of progress in the building up of a strong and self-reliant scientific and technological potential in order to promote its endogenous development and to tackle successfully problems of selection, transfer and adaptation of appropriate technologies.
51.27 Regarding communication, my delegation supports: the Draft Declaration, submitted to the General Conference by the Director-General in accordance with the provisions of 19 C/Resolution 4.143 and decision 5.5.4 adopted by the Executive Board, at its 104th session, whereby the principles governing the contribution of the mass media to strengthening peace and international understanding and to combating war propaganda, racialism and apartheid, will be promoted and reinforced.
51.28 My delegation, Mr. President, would like to express its full concurrence with the basic principles enunciated in paragraphs 204-207 of 20 C/5, which have guided the distinguished Director-General in preparing the budget. We are convinced that unless the Organization has at its disposal adequate financial means, it will not be in a position to respond efficiently and effectively to the responsibilities assigned to it and make its contribution to international efforts for the establishment of the new international economic order, a contribution to this noble endeavour which we consider of primary importance.
51.29 Nevertheless, we feel that more attention should be paid to programmes designed to promote technical co-operation among developing countries, an objective which we would have wished to see more concretely reflected in the programme.
51.30 As distinguished delegates are aware, the unanimous adoption of a pertinent plan of action by the United Nations Conference on Technical Co-operation among Developing Countries, which was held in Buenos Aires, Argentina, recently, constitutes a landmark in the history of technical co- operation. We believe that the momentum gained in Buenos Aires should not be allowed to decline. On the contrary, the plan's goals and objectives should be pursued with vigour and determination.
51.31 As announced by my colleague, the Minister of Finance, at that Conference, as a token of our commitment to the cause of TCDC we are willing to regionalize existing training institutions, particularly those established with international assistance such as the Higher Technical Institute, the Hotel and Catering Institute and the Cyprus Productivity Centre. We believe that all of them are of interest to other developing countries and especially to those in our region. In this regard we feel that Unesco could play & positive and catalytic role.
51.32 In conclusion, Mr. President, I would like to reiterate my deep appreciation of and our continued support for Unesco and the ideals which it represents. In a world deeply immersed in growing economic and social difficulties, Unesco can serve as the great forum for the defence of human rights, the protection of cultural values, and peaceful coexistence. Allow me, therefore, Mr. President, to express my delegation's earnest desire that the difficult tasks assigned to this Conference be dealt with in the most successful way. I feel confident that under your able leadership and the inspiration of the Director-General, the General Conference will achieve its objectives in accordance with the noble ideals of Unesco. Thank you, Mr. President.
52. Le PRESIDENT .- Je remercie le chef de la délégation de Chypre et je donne la parole à S.A. le prince Khalid Bin Fahad Bin Khalid, chef de la délégation de l'Arabie saoudite. YI o Y (ةيدوعسلاةيبرعلا)دهفنبدداخريم‏< Tied)ىلبيطي6اهؤاضعأودوفولاءاسؤرةداسلا«ماعلارمتوملاسيئر‏SEN emةيدوعسلاةيبرعلا‏ aىتوصمضأنأ Yنم‏e؛نسيرشعلاهترودىفماعلارمتؤمللاسيئرمكباختناىلعمكتدايس‏ ,Fallقيفوتلامكلاينمتم Sits уе e e Joelyمكفلسلريدقتلاو‏INueةرشعةعساتلاهترود—‏ Jesiدوهجنم‏ehنيماعلالالخ‏deلق‏Lىلع delsهتردقوماجاهيفتلجتةديلج‏E LizU Seyig‏ ..ةريبكلامهتازاجناوةصلخملامهدوهجىلعىدذيفنتلانملجملا‏Egبا EA ASue e ‎دوهجنمنولذبيامىلعهينواعموماعلاريدملاةدايسلهيجزا١ليزجلا a. пола Noseel y Jl NY Na daily aged) Vind ola YY e es 15 Ls ‎ةءافكوةردقب lll eN GLE lly Lilesdepe Ji ВИ ‎انيفاوو JLN Jae dez)!EN, E AS e gist Lg GL] e ueNoe OY grieten + Soie gl WI belgJelLa 0 e LAS Ela ‎ىف в teيااربندداج‏(ll Lo dd Bl) olaىلاتشاواللتاب‏hadal!٠.‏
(53.1) Le prince KHALID BIN FAHAD (Arabie saoudite).- (Traduit de l'arabe. ) Monsieur le Président de la Conférence générale, Messieurs les chefs et les membres des délégations, il m'est agréable de joindre, au nom de la délégation du Royaume de l'Arabie saoudite, ma voix à celles des orateurs qui m'ont précédé, pour vous féliciter de votre élection à la présidence de la vingtième session de la Conférence générale et vous adresser nos voeux de succès dans votre mission. Je voudrais également exprimer nos remerciements et notre appréciation à votre prédécesseur, le président de la dix-neuvième session, pour les efforts qu'il n'a cessé de déployer au cours de ces deux dernières années et pour les résultats de ces efforts, qui illustrent sa sagesse, sa compétence et sa compréhension des problèmes qui se sont posés à notre Organisation pendant cette période.
(53.2) J'aimerais aussi remercier le Président et les membres du Conseil exécutif pour des efforts qu'ils ont déployés et des résultats importants qu'ils ont obtenus.
(53.3) Je félicite le Directeur général et ses collaborateurs pour la compétence et l'énergie avec lesquelles ils assurent le fonctionnement de l'Organisation et pour la façon dont ils ont préparé cette session contri- buant ainsi efficacement, j'en suis sûr, à faciliter le déroulement de nos travaux et leur achèvement dans les délais prévus.
(53.4) Monsieur le Président, Messieurs les chefs des délégations, après avoir étudié les documents figurant à l'ordre du jour et fait connaître à l'Organisation notre opinion à leur sujet, nous voudrions ici exprimer notre satisfaction devant le contenu de ces documents, d'autant plus qu'ils sont dans leur ensemble conformes aux principes immuables auxquels souscrit notre pays et qu'il met en pratique.
(53.5) Nous considérons que le document principal 20 C/5 est pour l'essentiel conforme aux directives données par la Conférence générale à sa dix-neuvième session, mais nous constatons un déséquilibre dans la répartition des crédits prévus pour les différentes activités de l'Organisation, notamment dans le secteur de
534    la culture : comparés aux crédits prévus pour les autres régions, ceux qui sont proposés pour la région arabe ne couvrent qu'un petit nombre de projets. Nous souhaitons que 1'Organisation fera tout pour assurer une juste répartition des crédits alloués a ses programmes.
(53.6) Nous espérons aussi que l'inflation et les fluctuations monétaires n'absorberont pas une grande part de l'augmentation du budget de l'exercice 1979-1980. Nous sommes sûrs que le Directeur général s'emploiera à trouver une solution propre à éviter à l'Organisation et à son budget les conséquences des fluctuations monétaires, et donc à permettre à l'Unesco de consacrer l'augmentation de son budget à la réalisation de projets utiles au monde et au développement.
(53.7) Monsieur le Président, je voudrais rappeler le souci de mon pays de voir s'élargir la décentralisation de l'Organisation, grâce au renforcement des bureaux régionaux, à l'accroissement de leur budget et à l'extension de leurs attributions ; l'Unesco pourra ainsi assurer l'exécution et la continuité de ses programmes et mieux répondre aux besoins nationaux et régionaux des Etats membres.
(53.8) Monsieur le Président, le développement de l'éducation, l'amélioration de sa qualité et l'élargissement de sa base retiennent l'intérêt du Royaume de l'Arabie saoudite dans le cadre de ses plans de développement. Le deuxième plan quinquennal - actuellement ‘en cours d'exécution - attribue une place privilégiée aux services éducatifs puisque l'enseignement y bénéficie d'une priorité absolue. Au cours de ces cinq dernières années nous avons pu généraliser l'enseignement et l'étendre à tous les garçons et filles d'âge scolaire. De même, les garçons et les filles qui ont terminé leurs études secondaires peuvent accéder à l'enseignement supérieur. Je me borne à signaler ici qu'en moins de vingt-cinq ans, le Royaume de l'Arabie saoudite a pu créer six universités qui groupent toutes les disciplines. Outre la gratuité de l'enseignement général et universitaire, l'Etat alloue des bourses aux étudiants et leur assure gratuitement logement et nourriture. Nous avons accordé une très grande attention à la formation préalable et en cours d'emploi des enseignants visant à élever leur niveau de compétence, en renforçant les programmes appropriés et les écoles normales chargées de cette formation.
(53.9) Nous avons également entrepris l'élaboration d'une stratégie culturelle et professionnelle intégrée en vue d'éliminer l'analphabétisme. Le nombre des écoles créées à cette fin s'élevait à 1.652 à la fin de l'année scolaire écoulée, et celui des centres de formation professionnelle des adultes.a 24. Sur le plan qualitatif, nous avons fait un certain nombre d'études et mené des recherches qui nous ont permis de mettre au point de nouvelles formules en ce qui concerne les structures de l'enseignement, ses programmes et ses méthodes, afin de satisfaire les besoins du citoyen saoudien et de répondre aux exigences de la société ou il vit dans les domaines du développement social, économique et culturel, l'accent étant mis par ailleurs sur ce qui peut contribuer à renforcer et promouvoir la fraternité humaine et la compréhension internationale, compte tenu du développement que connaissent notre pays et notre région arabe.
(53.10) J'éprouve une grande satisfaction en indiquant aussi à la Conférence générale qu'un grand nombre d'élèves et d'étudiants d'autres pays - plus de 15 % de l'effectif total - ont eu la possibilité de faire des études dans les écoles et les universités du Royaume. Nous considérons que leur présence favorise la com- préhension mutuelle et le rapprochement entre les hommes, notion que nous jugeons important de diffuser.
(53.11) Dans le domaine des sciences et de la recherche scientifique, le Royaume de l'Arabie saoudite, tenant compte de l'évolution scientifique et du développement des recherches dans les différentes disciplines, a créé le "Centre national des sciences et de la technologie" qui est devenu le trait d'union entre les insti- tutions scientifiques nationales et internationales. Nous envisageons avec optimisme l'avenir immédiat de ce centre dont les réalisations et les études contribueront au développement de la connaissance humaine.
(53.12) Monsieur le Président, dès lors que nous parlons de l'éducation et de son accessibilité aux enfants des peuples, il est de mon devoir d'attirer l'attention de la Conférence générale sur ceux qui sont privés des droits légitimes les plus élémentaires : j'ai nommé les enfants des territoires arabes occupés, les enfants de Palestine. Si nous nous référons au document 20 C/113 qui nous est soumis par le Directeur général, nous pouvons y constater que les autorités d'occupation dispensent l'enseignement en fonction des impératifs de la politique qu'elles suivent et qui vise avant tout à annihiler la personnalité arabe palestinienne ; en modifiant et en dénaturant les programmes scolaires approuvés, elles y ont introduit ce qui en a fait des programmes hébreux enseignés en langue arabe. Et cela, Monsieur le Président, - comme le dit Mme Hénin membre de la mission envoyée par l'Unesco pour examiner sur place la situation réelle de l'éducation - dans le but de boucher l'horizon de la jeunesse arabe de Palestine en lui donnant une image déformée de son patrimoine culturel et de lui rendre impossible une ouverture sur le monde arabe et sur le monde contempo- rain en général. Les enfants des territoires arabes occupés, Monsieur le Président, fondent de grands espoirs sur notre Organisation - l'Unesco - attendant d'elle qu'elle les aide à faire valoir leur droit à un enseignement plus large, à l'instar des enfants des autres peuples qui ont été en mesure de traduire dans la réalité leur identité culturelle spécifique et de relier leur avenir à leur passé grâce aux programmes d'enseignement.
(53.13) Monsieur le Président, ce que je viens de dire à propos de l'éducation des enfants des territoires arabes occupés ne donne qu'un exemple - parmi d'autres - des souffrances endurées par les enfants de la Palestine arabe sous l'occupation. C'est une illustration cruelle de la discrimination raciale que nous combat- tons et dont notre Organisation s'efforce de délivrer l'homme partout dans le monde.
(53.14) S'inspirant de l'esprit de l'Islam auquel adhère mon pays et de ses nobles idéaux qui rejettent la discrimination sous toutes ses formes et prônent l'égalité, la justice, la liberté et la dignité pour tous, mon pays condamne la discrimination raciale sous tous ses aspects ; il affirme que la prise de position de notre Conférence générale contre la discrimination raciale et les résolutions qu'elle adopte dans ce sens constituent une victoire de l'homme dans sa lutte pour la dignité et la liberté, une victoire du monde entier contre l'oppression, la tyrannie et l'agression. Aussi condamnons-nous avec force les agissements des gouverne- ments des minorités racistes en Afrique et dans les territoires arabes occupés.
(53.15) Monsieur le Président, Messieurs les chefs et les membres des délégations, la sauvegarde de la culture et la préservation du patrimoine humain constituent l'une des missions essentielles de notre Organi- sation. Aussi est-il de mon devoir de rappeler ici que la ville de Jérusalem - ville arabe et vénérée par toutes les religions - subit la violation de ses lieux saints et des agressions commises contre son patrimoine et sa dignité, du fait des transformations dont sont l'objet ses sites culturels et religieux. Nous faisons appel du haut de cette tribune à la conscience mondiale, s'exprimant par l'action de notre Organisation, pour empêcher les autorités d'occupation en Palestine de poursuivre ces violations et cette politique d'oppres- sion que met en oeuvre Israël en altérant les caractéristiques essentielles et les vestiges archéologiques de cette ville sainte et en démolissant les édifices qui témoignent de la civilisation arabe. Monsieur le Président, mon pays exige que soient appliquées les résolutions adoptées par la Conférence générale lors de ses précé- dentes sessions en vue d'assurer la protection de la ville de Jérusalem sur le plan culturel, et de mettre un terme à ce mépris de la volonté internationale et à ces agressions criminelles contre les biens culturels.
(53.16) Quant au nouvel ordre économique international, Monsieur le Président, le Royaume de 1'Arabie saoudite s'inspire, dans son organisation économique, des principes de l'Islam qui respectent la propriété individuelle, la liberté économique et l'égalité des chances. Ces principes se reflètent fidèlement dans sa politique économique extérieure. L'Arabie saoudite est en effet convaincue que les principes de l'Islam en cette matière favorisent les échanges libres et justes et éliminent l'exploitation sous toutes ses formes. Elle oeuvre donc activement pour l'instauration d'un nouvel ordre économique international qui soit plus juste et qui garantisse le respect des droits de tous les Etats dans un cadre de compréhension et de coopération internationales. Elle harmonise ainsi son action avec la noble mission dont s'acquitte notre Organisation et les efforts méritoires que celle-ci déploie pour rapprocher pays développés et pays en développement, assurer une croissance équilibrée mettant fin au scandale du sous-développement sous toutes ses formes et garantir à chaque être humain une vie digne et juste.
(53.17) Monsieur le Président, Messieurs les chefs et les membres des délégations, mon pays, s'inspirant de l'esprit de coopération internationale illustré par les objectifs de notre Organisation, convaincu de la nécessité d'affermir cet esprit et soucieux d'aider l'Organisation à surmonter les difficultés auxquelles se heurte l'exécution de ses programmes, a répondu favorablement en 1975 à l'appel du Directeur général en prêtant à l'Organisation - sans intérêt - une somme de 4.600.000 dollars des Etats-Unis. Il m'est agréable aujourd'hui d'annoncer que le gouvernement de l'Arabie saoudite a décidé de ne pas se faire rembourser ce montant dont il fait don à l'Organisation pour couvrir le coût des projets que décidera le Directeur général, en consultation avec le Royaume d'Arabie saoudite. En exprimant mes voeux de succès à notre Organisation, je vous adresse, Monsieur le Président, tous mes souhaits pour la réussite de vos travaux et mon salut qui s'adresse aussi à tous mes collègues les délégués.
(55.1) M. NAJI (Qatar).- (Traduit de l'arabe. ) Monsieur le Président de la Conférence générale, Monsieur le Directeur général de l'Unesco, Messieurs les chefs et les membres des délégations, Mesdames, Messieurs, permettez-moi de présenter, au nom de la «délégation de l'Etat Qatar et en mon nom personnel, nos sincères félicitations à Monsieur le Président de la Conférence générale pour son élection à cette haute fonction. Nous sommes certains que, gface à sa sagesse et à sa longue expérience, il dirigera nos travaux avec compétence et succès. Je crois que nous sommes tous ici prêts à l'assurer du concours sans réserve de nos délégations afin de l'aider à s'acquitter de sa lourde tâche.
(55.2) Permettez-moi aussi, Messieurs, d'adresser mes félicitations aux Etats qui ont été admis à l'Organi- sation depuis la dix-neuvième session en leur souhaitant de participer efficacement à nos travaux et de tirer rapidement profit des activités de l'Unesco. Et à cette occasion qui m'est donnée, je voudrais, en tant que représentant d'un Etat arabe, exprimer notre très grande satisfaction devant le triomphe de l'esprit du bien, de la liberté et de l'égalité que représente la décision de votre Assemblée d'admettre la Namibie comme membre de votre Organisation, malgré l'opposition des oppresseurs et des colonialistes.
(55.3) J'adresse mes sincères remerciements à notre ami M. Amadou-Mahtar M'Bow, directeur général de l'Unesco, et à ses collaborateurs pour la bonne préparation des documents de la Conférence, en particulier le Projet de programme et de budget.
(55.4) J'exprime aussi ma gratitude au Président et aux membres du Conseil exécutif pour les efforts inlassables qu'ils ont déployés afin d'assurer l'exécution des résolutions adoptées par la Conférence à sa dix-neuvième session et la préparation des travaux de la vingtième session.
(55.5) Mesdames, Messieurs, je voudrais tout d'abord souligner le grand intérêt que porte notre gouverne- ment à l'éducation. Mais la grande chance de l'éducation dans notre pays est que Son Altesse l'Emir du Qatar lui porte personnellement un vif intérêt ; en effet, avant d'accéder au pouvoir, il a été le Premier ministre de l'éducation au début du réveil de notre pays, il y a une vingtaine d'années. Il est fermement convaincu que l'éducation est le meilleur et le plus durable investissement. D'où son vif intérêt et son appui résolu à tout ce qui concerne l'éducation et ses problèmes.
(55.6) Entre la dix-neuvième et la vingtième session de la Conférence générale, l'Etat du Qatar a porté à son crédit un grand nombre de réalisations que j'éviterai d'exposer ici pour ne pas abuser du temps pré- cieux dont vous disposez. J'en laisserai donc le soin aux nombreux rapports et publications émanant du Ministère de l'éducation et je me limiterai à de brefs aperçus sur les résultats de la coopération de notre pays avec l'Unesco. J'y ajouterai quelques observations sur le Projet de programme et de budget pour l'exercice 1979-1980, étant donné que ces deux points constituent les thèmes essentiels que nous sommes appelés à examiner et sur lesquels nous devons nous prononcer ici.
(55.7) Monsieur le Président, depuis son admission à l'Unesco, le Qatar s'emploie à assurer son développe- ment à l'instar de la plupart des Etats du monde en cette deuxième moitié du vingtième siècle. Je dois reconnaître ici le mérite qui revient à l'Unesco d'avoir stimuler cet effort dans les domaines de sa compé- tence. Notre pays a tiré grand profit de l'expérience de l'Organisation en matière d'éducation, de culture et de science.
(55.8) Dans le domaine de l'enseignement général, l'Unesco nous prête son concours pour le développement des programmes scolaires notamment en matière de mathématiques modernes ou de sciences intégrées, de même que pour l'étude des problèmes de l'enseignement et de sa modernisation. Un grand nombre d'études et d'activités ont pu ainsi être réalisées avec la collaboration du Bureau du représentant de l'Unesco auprès des Etats du Golfe (à Doha) et du Bureau régional d'éducation de Beyrouth, notamment l'étude pilote sur la productivité de l'enseignement, les stages de formation des directeurs d'écoles, les études, recherches et séminaires sur l'amélioration du rendement de l'éducation du point de vue des déperditions d'effectif. Ces activités ont donné d'excellents résultats.
(55.9) Nous collaborons également avec l'Unesco dans le domaine du développement des constructions sco- laires, l'objectif étant que ces constructions répondent aux besoins de l'école moderne et soient conformes aux orientations actuelles de l'éducation.
(55.10) Mais l'apport le plus précieux de l'Unesco se situe sans doute dans le domaine de l'enseignement supérieur ; il a commencé par le projet commun de création de deux instituts supérieurs de formation des instituteurs et institutrices ; ce projet s'est ensuite développé, après une étude conjointe sur le remplace- ment des deux instituts par deux facultés de niveau universitaire qui ont commencé à fonctionner en 1972 grâce aux remarquables experts que nous a fournis l'Unesco pour les différentes disciplines, et qui ont contribué à asseoir l'enseignement universitaire au Qatar sur des bases modernes et évoluées. Ces deux facultés ont déjà formé deux promotions d'instituteurs et d'institutrices qui nous ont aidés à satisfaire nos besoins de personnel enseignant. L'an dernier, l'Etat du Qatar a pris une mesure ambitieuse avec la pro- mulgation du décret princier créant l'Université du Qatar ; trois nouvelles facultés sont déjà en place sciences, sciences humaines et études islamiques. L'aide de l'Unesco à notre jeune université est renforcée par l'envoi d'experts, de matériel et de consultants. Il en va de même pour ce qui est des bâtiments universitaires.
(55.11) Après cet aperçu rapide de notre coopération avec l'Unesco sur le plan national, nous nous référe- rons à notre coopération avec l'Organisation sur le plan régional : nous appuyons le contenu du chapitre 7 du 20 C/5, en particulier les paragraphes 7025 et 7026 sur la poursuite de la coopération de l'Unesco avec les institutions dépendant de la Ligue des Etats arabes, notamment l'ALECSO, ainsi que l'Organisation régionale arabe pour l'alphabétisation et l'éducation des adultes, le Centre d'éducation de base de Sir El Layyan et le Bureau arabe d'éducation pour les Etats du Golfe à Riad. Nous appuyons également ce qui est dit au paragraphe 7029 du document précité en ce qui concerne le Bureau du représentant de l'Unesco auprès des Etats du Golfe à Doha (Qatar) et nous souhaitons que soit renforcé l'appui de l'Unesco à ce Bureau qui - bien que créé récemment - a fait la preuve de son efficacité et de sa compétence pour ce qui est de stimuler les projets entrepris par l'Unesco dans la région. En outre, je souhaite particulièrement le maintien de l'étroite coopération entre l'Unesco et l'ALECSO et je demande que cette coopération soit encore intensifiée sur la base de la concertation complète et .effective dans tous les domaines d'activité, pour le bien de la région arabe.
(55.12) Monsieur le Président, Messieurs, permettez-moi de saluer ici les efforts déployés par l'Unesco en vue de l'instauration d'un nouvel ordre international dans les domaines de l'éducation, de la culture et de la science, dans lequel la fraternité mondiale se substituera à l'égoïsme et qui permettra aux pays en dévelop- pement de satisfaire leurs aspirations et leurs besoins dans ces domaines. Je voudrais également saluer les efforts que déploie l'Unesco en vue de l'instauration d'un nouvel ordre économique garantissant à ces pays la maîtrise de leur économie et la mettant à l'abri de l'exploitation exercée par les puissances économiques actuelles qui ont si bien prouvé leur capacité d'exploiter ces économies au maximum.
(55.13) En évoquant les questions de liberté, de justice, d'égalité et de protection des peuples contre l'exploitation, nous nous trouvons inévitablement amenés à parler d'une question extrêmement importante, dont ont traité nombre des orateurs qui m'ont précédé et qui a déjà fait l'objet de dizaines de résolutions de la Conférence générale et de dizaines de rapports qui vous ont été soumis par l'Organisation (documents
20 C/113 - 20 C/19, etc.) ; il s'agit de la question du peuple palestinien, quotidiennement exposé à une oppression sans précédent de la part des autorités israéliennes usurpatrices qui ont privé les propriétaires légitimes du territoire, des droits de l'homme les plus élémentaires, et ont privé leurs enfants de la possibi- lité de bénéficier de l'enseignement national correspondant à leurs croyances et à leur culture. Je n'ai pas assez de mots pour condamner les violations commises par la clique israélienne dans la ville sainte de Jéru- salem que vénèrent des millions d'hommes. En dépit de vos louables résolutions, les sionistes ont pu modifier, par leurs fouilles, les caractéristiques de la ville sainte, démolir les édifices arabes anciens et dénaturer leur aspect culturel. Nous ne saurions être dupes de l'arrêt actuel des fouilles décidé par les sionistes à l'occasion de la réunion de la Conférence générale ; ce n'est là qu'un exemple de la duplicité qu'on leur connaît depuis des siècles. Je puis vous assurer que les coups de pioche destructeurs ne tarderont pas à retentir dès qu'aura pris fin cette session. Il vous incombe d'adopter une mesure décisive qui mette un terme à ces violations criminelles dont est victime la ville sainte de Jérusalem.
(55.14) Messieurs, l'Organisation et la Conférence ont aussi le devoir de lutter contre toutes les formes d'oppression et d'exploitations où qu'elles apparaissent, et de combattre l'odieuse discrimination raciale pratiquée dans les territoires arabes occupés de Palestine, en Afrique du Sud et au Zimbabwe. Vous pouvez être certains que grâce à votre lutte, à votre détermination et à celle de millions d'honnêtes gens dans le monde, ces systèmes racistes disparaîtront tôt ou tard avec l'aide de Dieu tout puissant.
(55.15) Monsieur le Président, Messieurs, je ne puis que rendre hommage à l'effort qui a abouti à l'élabo- ration du Projet de programme et de budget pour l'exercice 1979-1980, dont nous souhaitons qu'il soit intégralement exécuté. Nous avons apprécié que l'Unesco ait établi un lien étroit entre le Programme et le Plan à moyen terme, ainsi qu'en témoigne clairement le document 20 C/5. Nous apprécions de même l'impor- tance accordée aux programmes de sciences exactes et naturelles et l'accent mis sur l'interaction entre la science et ses applications d'une part et la société de l'autre, ainsi que la formulation de politiques de la science et de la technologie et les activités de recherche et de formation dans le domaine scientifique.
(55.16) Nous espérons que la région arabe, riche en possibilités de développement et en ressources natu- relles et humaines, se verra accorder la place qu'elle mérite. Nous espérons aussi que les crédits alloués à la culture arabe seront augmentés, car ils sont jusqu'ici dérisoires et absolument sans rapport avec le rôle mondial de cette culture et son influence sur les autres cultures.
(55.17) Monsieur le Président, je ne voudrais pas abuser du temps de notre assemblée ; je me borne donc à ces aperçus rapides et à ces brèves observations, laissant aux membres de notre délégation le soin de présenter devant les différentes commissions nos observations détaillées sur le Projet de programme et de budget.
(55.18) Avant de quitter cette tribune, je me dois de rendre hommage à la sagesse avec laquelle l'Organi- sation est divisée. Son directeur général, M. Amadou-Mahtar M'Bow, a fait preuve depuis qu'il est entré - il y a peu de temps - en fonction d'une efficacité et d'une compétence remarquables, ainsi que de fermeté face aux défis et aux difficultés. Grâce à sa vaste culture, à sa sagesse et à son courage, il a pu gagner le respect unanime de l'Organisation et la mener à bon port. Qu'il accepte en échange nos remerciements, notre estime et notre gratitude. Nous lui adressons ainsi qu'à ses collaborateurs notre salut respectueux. Quant à vous, Messieurs, je vous souhaïte plein succès dans vos travaux pour le bien de l'humanité et la réalisation de la paix.
56.1 Le PRESIDENT.- Je remercie le chef de la délégation du Qatar.
56.2 Je dois maintenant donner satisfaction a deux délégations qui ont invoqué leur droit de ré- ponse ; je donne d'abord la parole au délégué du Nicaragua.
(57.1) M. SEVILLA SIERO (Nicaragua).- (Traduit de l'espagnol.) Le représentant de 1'Union des républiques socialistes soviétiques a fait allusion, dans son allocution de ce matin, au Nicaragua, et c'est lá la raison de cette breve déclaration, que je ferai non pas dans un esprit de polémique mais pour apporter certaines précisions et éclaircissements.
(57.2) Je ne veux pas que l'on ait une idée fausse de mon pays au sujet duquel on a donné, au cours des derniers mois, une série d'informations qui déforment la réalité des faits. Le gouvernement du Nicaragua n'est ni fasciste ni réactionnaire, et, à sa tête, se trouve le Président de la République qui, à l'heure actuelle, exerce le mandat constitutionnel qui lui a été confié par le suffrage populaire. En ce qui concerne les droits de l'homme, question aussi actuelle qu'intéressante, je puis vous informer que la Commission interaméricaine des droits de l'homme, organe de l'Organisation des Etats américains (OEA), s'est rendue récemment au Nicaragua, où on lui a fourni toute l'aide et toutes les facilités nécessaires pour l'exercice des fonctions qui sont les siennes ; le gouvernement du Nicaragua a d'ailleurs saisi cette occasion pour exposer ses vues sur la question. Je vous remercie, Monsieur le Président.
58. Le PRESIDENT .- Je remercie le délégué du Nicaragua et je donne la parole au délégué de la Turquie.
59.1 Mr. SUBASI (Turkey): Thank you, Mr. President, for giving me the floor. It is indeed regrettable that the repre- sentative of the Greek Cypriot administration has again used this forum to indulge in anti-Turkish propaganda. The allegations we have heard are neither new nor true; they have been repeated again and again in every possible international gathering. They have also been replied to in detail. I shall therefore try to be brief.
59.2 The representative of the Greek Cypriot administration in Cyprus has spoken about aggression and invasion. Mr. President, Turkey sent a force to the island in the exercise of her rights and obligations under the 1963 Treaty of Guarantee, in order to prevent Greek Cypriots, in collaboration with the former junta, from destroying the bicommunal independence created by the 1960 agreements, and to save the Turkish Cypriots from the imminent danger of total genocide. The mass graves of Turkish Cypriots discovered at Aloa, Sandallari, Maratha, Tohni, Ayios Vassilios and other places are vivid examples of what would have befallen Turkish Cypriots but for the timely intervention of Turkey.
59.3 Furthermore, the Cyprus problem has not arisen from the legitimate intervention of 20 July
1974. The whole world knows that for more than a decade Turkish Cypriots were massacred and tortured, deprived of their most elementary rights, subjected to blatant discrimination and complete disregard of the basic provisions of the Constitution. They were abused, humiliated, insulted and imprisoned in their own country, simply because they wished to preserve the bicommunal independ- ence, sovereignty and integrity of Cyprus.
59.4 The representative of the Greek administration in Cyprus has spoken about education in the north of the island. Well, Greek Cypriot children have access in the north to well-equipped schools for primary education, there are enough Greek teachers in the north to teach the primary school- children, and pupils of secondary school age are free to attend secondary schools in the south. Arrangements are also made for the return of these pupils to join their families in the north during vacations. According to paragraph 35 of the 1976 report of the United Nations Secretary-General, in the field of education all elementary schools, including a nursery, which by any standards is almost a luxury in villages, are open and functioning normally in the north. There is one teacher for every 30 pupils, a ratio which is far better than international standards and than the standards prevailing in the Greek Cypriot controlled region of the island.
59.5 The Greek Cypriot representative has also spoken about looting and pillaging of the cultural heritage of Cyprus. Well, the World Council of Churches twice sent one of its distinguished members, John B. Taylor, to Cyprus to investigate the allegations on the spot. In a late communiqué issued by the Ecumenical Press Service, it was reiterated that Dr. Taylor was able to refute some press reports that churches had been demolished. It was also stressed that the important icon collections and icon workshops at Tremethousa were found under strict control of the Turkish Federated State of Cyprus. Unesco sent Mr. Jacques Dalibard in February 1975 to Cyprus to investigate the accusa- tions made by the Greek Cypriots. May I quote the following extract from Mr. Dalibard's report of January 1976 (P/1975-1976/3-41): "All the known collections and a large number of religious artifacts
540     found in abandoned churches have been stored in central locations such as Morphou, Nicosia, Kyrenia 12 and Famagusta. The cataloguing of these objects was quite advanced. All the significant antiquities found in the antique shops within the Turkish-controlled zone had been restored. Regulations governing the control of cultural property such as excavations, the sale and possession of antiquities and so on had been drafted and were being considered for adoption by the Turkish Cypriot leaders".
59.6 Mr. President, can we say the same about the Muslim cultural heritage in the south of the island? Among the worst acts of violence resorted to by Greek Cypriots in Cyprus, those committed against Muslim religious institutions are outstanding. Mosques, shrines and other places of worship were attacked, bombed, machine-gunned, burnt down, ripped to the ground by bulldozers in the most outrageous and abominable manner. Of the 274 mosques and shrines and other places of Muslim worship in the island, 103 were attacked and demolished. The material damage inflicted upon them amounts to many millions. Some of them were razed to the ground and others were set on fire and severely damaged, after they had been looted and stripped of all their precious belongings.
59.7 I will give you a few examples of this. The historically famous mosque of Bayraktar suffered several times at the hands of the Greek Cypriots. Its minaret had been bombed off, interior sections had been destroyed, its centuries-old carpets and other precious furnishings looted, and, as if what was done was not enough, its precincts have been bulldozed and now serve as a car-park for the Greek Cypriots. Today its ruins and the car-park around it stand as a "monument of shame" and tangible evidence of the grim realities of the Cyprus problem. Another example is the Umm-Haram shrine beside the salt lake in Larnaca. It has been a sacred place not only for the Turkish com- munity of Cyprus, but for the whole Islamic world since 648 A.D. It enshrines the sacred tomb of the Prophet's foster aunt. The mosque of the shrine has been turned into a military post. The precious carpets, irreplaceable historic ornaments and treasures of the shrine have been plundered by the Greek Cypriots. Today the shrine is left in the south and its fate is unknown.
59.8 Another mosque is the Camii Cedit, the new mosque at Ktima town in Paphos district. It was the largest and most important mosque of the town with special historical and architectural interest. In the early stages of the Greek onslaught, this mosque was attacked with mortars and bazookas and its minaret was blown up. Later it was invaded, ransacked and set on fire. At a much later date, the charred remains of the mosque were razed completely by bulldozers and its consecrated site was eventually turned into a car-park. I can cite you also the example of the Hazrat Omar shrine, and also of the Omerieh mosque and of the "mosque of the Arabs", the Araplar mosque, and I can continue the list, Mr. President, for the remaining 103 mosques, but I shall not abuse your time. All I wish to say is that these are the facts, these are the realities and no propaganda can deform them. Thank you, Mr. President.
60. Le PRESIDENT.- A Je remercie le délégué de la Turquie. Est-ce que la délégation de Chypre a un commentaire à présenter ? Il ne peut s'agir, conformément à l'usage établi, que d'une brève rectification. Le chef de la délégation de Chypre a la parole.
61. Mr. SOFIANOS (Cyprus): Thank you, Mr. President. The honourable delegate from Turkey chose a very regrettable course, and at this point in time I wish to propose that a fact-finding mission from Unesco goes to Cyprus. Would he accept that a permanent mission be established there, so that facts can be brought to the light? Secondly, I would like to state that the allegation that discrimination has been exercised against the Turkish Cypriot minority is unfounded; I will merely refer to the following quotation from United Nations sources: "The hardships suffered by the Turkish Cypriot population are the direct results of the Turkish Cypriot leadership. Self-isolation policy is imposed by force on the rank and file". This evidence comes from the Secretary-General's report, S/6426. In fact, Mr. President, the Turkish Cypriots are the victims of the Turkish invasion, as their Greek Cypriot compatriots are; the honourable delegate from Turkey would do well to heed this report, which comes from the area occupied by the tanks of the Turkish army, and which clearly descirbes the trials and tribulations of the Turkish Cypriots because of occupation and exploitation by the Turkish army. Thank you, Mr. President.
62. Le PRESIDENT : Ces rectifications ayant été apportées, la séance est levée. The meeting rose at 6.45 p.m. La séance est levée à 18 h. 45 Se levanta la sesión a las 18.45 Заседание закрывается в 18.45  ‏0855flaموةسداسلاةعاسلاىفةسلجلاتعفر